1:1 All wisdom is from Yahweh, And is with him for eternity.
1:2 The sand of the seas, and the drops of rain, And the days of eternity: who will number [them]?
1:3 The height of heaven, and the width of the earth, And the depth of the deep: who will search [them]?
1:4 Before all things, wisdom was allotted, And understanding of intelligence from eternity.
1:6 The root of wisdom, to whom was it revealed? And her secrets, who knew [them]? 
1:8 There is one, he alone is to be feared, Yahweh, he rules over her treasuries;
1:9 He allotted her and numbered her, And poured her out on all his works,
1:10 Among all flesh according to his gift, And he supplied her to those who fear him.
1:11 The fear of the Lord is glory and exultation, And gladness and a crown of joy.
1:12 The fear of the Lord delights the heart. And gives gladness, and joy, and length of days.
1:13 For him who fears the Lord it will be well at the last. And in the day of his death he will find grace.
1:14 The beginning of wisdom is the fear of Yahweh, And with the faithful, she was interwoven in the womb;
1:15 Among men she constructed an eternal foundation, And among their seed, she will be trusted in.
1:16 The abundance of wisdom is the fear of Yahweh, And she soaks them with her nectar.
1:17 Their whole house she fills with delicacies, And their storehouses with her produce.
1:18 The crown of wisdom is the fear of Yahweh, Blossoming with peace and improving health.
1:19 She is a strong staff and a glorious stay; And lifted up the glory of those who held her.
1:20 The root of wisdom is to fear Yahweh, And her branches are length of days.
1:22 Unrighteous wrath cannot be justified, For the wrath of his anger will [occasion] his fall.
1:23 The longsuffering man endures until the [proper] time, And in the end joy will arise for him;
1:24 He hides his words until the [proper] time, And the lips of the faithful will declare his understanding.
1:25 In the treasures of wisdom there is a wise proverb, But godliness is an abomination to the sinner.
1:26 If you desire wisdom, keep the commandments. And the Lord will grant her freely to you.
1:27 For the fear of the Lord is wisdom and instruction, And faith and meekness are his good pleasure.
1:28 Do not disobey the fear of the Lord, And do not come near thereto with a double heart.
1:29 Do not be a hypocrite in the sight of men. And take heed to [the utterances of] your lips.
1:30 Do not exalt yourself lest you fall And bring upon your soul disgrace. And the Lord reveal your hidden [thoughts], And cast you down in the midst of the assembly, Because you did not come to the fear of the Lord, And your heart was full of deceit.
2:1 My son, if you draw near to the fear of Yahweh, Prepare your soul for trial.
2:2 Direct your heart aright, and continue steadfast, And do not hurry in time of calamity.
2:3 Stick to him, and don't be far, That you may be increased in your latter end.
2:4 Accept all that is brought on you, And be patient in changes of your affliction;
2:5 For gold is proved in fire, And acceptable men in a furnace of affliction.
2:6 Trust in him and he will strengthen you, Make straight your ways and hope in him.
2:7 You<sup><small>+</small></sup> who fear the Lord, wait for his mercy; And do not turn aside lest you<sup><small>+</small></sup> fall.
2:8 You<sup><small>+</small></sup> who fear the Lord, put your<sup><small>+</small></sup> trust in him, And your<sup><small>+</small></sup> reward will not fail.
2:9 You<sup><small>+</small></sup> who fear the Lord, hope for good things, And for eternal gladness and mercy.
2:10 Look to the generations of old, and see: Who trusted in Yahweh, and was put to shame? Or who abided in his fear, and was forsaken? Or who called on him, and was overlooked? 
2:11 For Yahweh is merciful and gracious, And he saves in time of trouble.
2:12 Woe to fearful hearts and faint hands, And to the sinner who goes two ways.
2:13 Woe to the faint heart; because it does not believe, Therefore it will not be sheltered.
2:14 Woe to you<sup><small>+</small></sup> who have lost patience, And what will you<sup><small>+</small></sup> do when the Lord visits you<sup><small>+</small></sup>?
2:15 Those who fear the Lord will not be disobedient to his words, And those who love him will keep his ways.
2:16 Those who fear the Lord will seek his good pleasure, And those who love him will be filled with the law.
2:17 Those who fear the Lord will make ready their hearts, And will humble their souls in his sight.
2:18 For as is his majesty, so also is his mercy, And as is his name, so also are his works.
3:1 My sons, listen to your<sup><small>+</small></sup> father, And do as he says, that you<sup><small>+</small></sup> may live.
3:2 For Yahweh glorified the father over the sons, And he firmly set the mother's judgment over them.
3:3 He who honors [his] father makes atonement for sins,
3:4 And he who gives glory to his mother is as one who lays up treasure.
3:5 He who honors [his] father will rejoice under [his] sons, And in the day of his prayer he will be listened to.
3:6 He who glorifies [his] father will have length of days, And he who listens to God honors his mother.
3:8 My son, in word and in deed honor your father, So that all blessings may overtake you.
3:9 A father's blessing lays the foundation for the root, But a mother's curse plucks up the plant.
3:10 Do not honor yourself by your father's shame, For that is no honor to you.
3:11 A man's glory is the glory of his father, But he who curses his mother increases sin.
3:12 My son, strengthen yourself in the honor of your father, And do not forsake him all the days of your life;
3:13 And even though his mind fails, leave him alone, And do not shame him all the days of his life.
3:14 A father's righteousness will not be wiped away, And sin will be the recompense for breaking it down.
3:15 In the day of distress it will be remembered to you, As heat on frost, to cause your iniquities to cease.
3:16 For he who despises his father acts proudly, And he who curses his mother provokes his Creator.
3:17 My son, in your riches walk in meekness, And you will be loved more than he who gives gifts.
3:18 Make your soul smaller than all the great [souls] of old, And before God you will find mercy.
3:20 For many are the mercies of God, And to the meek he reveals his secret.
3:21 Do not seek out things which are too wonderful for you, And do not search for that which is hidden from you.
3:22 Think about what you are permitted, And do not occupy yourself in hidden things.
3:23 And do not get into what is beyond you, For more than you can handle has already been show you.
3:24 For many are the thoughts of the sons of man, And evil imaginations cause [them] to go astray.
3:26 A hardened heart grows bad at its end, But he who loves good things is guided in them.
3:27 A hardened heart increases sorrows, And he who is profane adds iniquity to iniquity.
3:28 The wound of a scoffer, there are no healings for it, For his plant is of an evil plant.
3:29 A wise heart understands proverbs of the wise, And an ear that listens to wisdom rejoices.
3:30 A burning fire is quenched by water, Likewise righteousness atones for sin.
3:31 He who does good, it will meet him in his ways, And when he is moved he will find support.
4:1 My son, do not mock at the life of the poor, And do not grieve the eyes of him who is in bitterness of soul.
4:2 Do not snort at the misery of the soul who lacks, And do not hide yourself from a contrite soul.
4:3 Do not trouble the insides of the oppressed, And do not withhold a gift from your indigent.
4:4 Do not despise the requests of the needy,
4:5 And you will not give him a place to curse you.
4:6 He who is bitter in spirit cries out in the pain of his soul, And his Rock will hear the voice of his cry.
4:7 Cause your soul to be loved by the congregation, And to a ruler, moreover, bow your head.
4:8 Incline your ear to the poor, And answer his [greeting of] Peace, with meekness.
4:9 Save the oppressed from his oppressors, And do not let your spirit be weary with right judgment.
4:10 Be as a father to the fatherless, And in the place of a husband to widows. And God will call you son, And will be gracious to you.
4:11 Wisdom teaches her sons, And testifies to all who understand her.
4:12 Those who love her, love life. And those who seek her, will obtain favor from Yahweh.
4:13 And those who lay hold on her will find honor from Yahweh, And will encamp in the blessing of Yahweh.
4:14 Those who are holy servants, serve her, And his tent [is] among those who desire her.
4:15 He who hears me, will judge in truth; And he who listens to me, will be given a room in my house.
4:17 For in disguise, I will walk with him; And at first, he will choose trials.
4:18 Then at the time his heart is filled with me, I will lead him again, and reveal to him my secrets.
4:19 If he turns away, I will cast him off, And deliver him into the hands of the spoilers.
4:20 My son, observe the time and season, and be afraid of evil. And do not be ashamed to your soul.
4:21 For there is a shame that brings sin, And there is a shame that brings glory and grace.
4:22 Do not regard your soul, And do not stumble because of your shame.
4:23 Do not withhold a word in due season, And do not hide your wisdom.
4:24 For by speech wisdom is made known, And understanding by the answer of the tongue.
4:25 Do not speak against the truth, And concerning your ignorance be ashamed.
4:26 Do not be ashamed to turn from iniquity, And do not stand before a rushing stream.
4:27 Do not lay yourself down under a fool, And do not show favoritism before the mighty.
4:28 Until death strive for the truth, and Yahweh will fight for you.
4:29 Do not be boastful with your tongue, And slack and negligent with your work.
4:30 Do not be as a lion in your house, And reckless in your cultivating.
4:31 Do not let your hand be stretched out to receive, And drawn back to return.
5:1 Do not lean on your strength, And do not say, It is in the power of my hand.
5:2 Do not go after your heart and your eyes, To walk in the pleasures of evil.
5:3 Do not say, Who is able to [reach] his strength, For Yahweh seeks the persecuted.
5:4 Do not say, I have sinned, and will he do anything to me? For God is slow to anger.
5:5 Do not trust in forgiveness,  To add iniquity to iniquity;
5:6 And then say, His mercies are great,  He will pardon the multitude of my iniquities. For mercy and anger are with him,  And upon the wicked he will lay his wrath.
5:7 Do not delay to turn to him; And do not put it off from day to day. For suddenly his indignation will go forth; And in the time of vengeance you will be consumed.
5:8 Do not trust in possessions of falsehood, For they will not profit in the day of wrath.
5:9 Do not be scattered in every wind, And do not walk in every path.
5:10 Be established in your knowledge, And afterward will be your words.
5:11 Be swift to give ear, And in patience of spirit return an answer.
5:12 If you have anything [to say], answer your fellow man; If not, [put] your hand on your mouth.
5:13 Glory and shame are in the hand of one who speaks rashly; And the tongue of a man is his fall.
5:14 Do not be called double-tongued; And with your tongue do not slander a friend. For a thief, shame was created; And reproach for the friend of the double-tongued.
5:15 Little or great, do not destroy; And instead of a friend, do not be an enemy.
6:1 Reproach will give you an evil name and shame to inherit; So [it will be with] an evil man [who is] double-tongued.
6:2 Do not fall into the hand of your desire; Or it will smother your strength over you.
6:3 It will eat your leaves and root out your fruit; And leave you like a dry tree.
6:4 For excessive desire destroys its owners; And the gladness of an enemy will overtake them.
6:5 A sweet mouth grows a friend; And graceful lips will greet [saying], Peace.
6:6 Let the men who greet you [saying], Peace, be many; But the owner of your secret, one among a thousand.
6:7 Have you gotten a friend? Get him in trial; And do not be in a hurry to rely on him.
6:8 For there is a fair-weathered friend, Who will not continue in the day of trouble.
6:9 There is a friend who turns into an enemy, And with strife he will uncover your reproach.
6:10 There is a friend who is company at a table, But will not be found in the day of evil.
6:11 When things are good for you, he is like you; But when things are bad for you, he will despise you. 
6:12 If evil overtakes you, he will turn against you; And he will hide himself from your face.
6:13 Separate yourself from your enemies; Take heed of your friends.
6:14 A faithful friend is a solid friend; And he who finds him, finds wealth.
6:15 For a faithful friend, there is no price; And there is no weight for his goodness.
6:16 A faithful friend is a bundle of life; He who fears God will obtain it.
6:17 For as much as he is, so is his fellow man; And as his name is, so is his value.
6:18 My son, from your youth choose understanding; And until your gray head you will attain wisdom.
6:19 As the plowman and as the reaper, come near to her; And wait for the abundance of her increase. For in serving her, you will serve a little; And tomorrow you will eat her fruit.
6:20 To a fool, she is one who restrains; And he who is void of understanding will not bear her.
6:21 She will be like a burdensome stone on him; And he will not delay to cast her away.
6:22 For as her name is, so is her instruction; And she is not plain to many.
6:25 Incline your shoulder and carry her; And do not be weary of her bundle.
6:27 Inquire and conduct a search; seek and find. And take hold of her and don't let her go.
6:28 For afterward you will find her rest; And [it] will be changed to a delight for you.
6:29 And she will be for you a net, a place of strength; And she will bundle [the net] with garments of gold.
6:30 Her yoke is an ornament of gold; And her bonds are a cord of blue.
6:31 You will put her on as garments of glory; And crown yourself with her as a crown of beauty.
6:32 If it pleases you, my son, you will become wise; And if you establish your heart, you will become prudent.
6:33 If you will bring yourself to hear, And incline your ear, you will be instructed. 
6:35 Be pleased to hear all talk; And do not let a proverb of understanding get away from you.
6:36 See who understands and seek him diligently; And let your foot wear away his threshold.
6:37 Diligently consider the fear of the Most High; And always study his commandments. And he will give your heart understanding; And according to that which you desire, he will teach you wisdom.
7:1 Do not do evil to yourself; And evil will not overtake you.
7:2 Keep far from iniquity; And it will turn away from you.
7:3 Do not knowingly plow against a brother; Or else you will reap it sevenfold.
7:4 Do not seek dominion from God; Or likewise a seat of honor from a king.
7:5 Do not justify yourself before a king; And before a king, do not make yourself wise.
7:6 Do not seek to be a ruler If you do not have the strength to make pride cease. Or else you will be afraid of the noble; And allow unjust gain in your integrity.
7:7 Do not cause your condemnation in the gates of the congregation; And you will not cause your fall in the assembly.
7:8 Do not conspire to sin twice; For in one you will not go unpunished.
7:9 Do not be stressed in the service of work; For it has been allotted by God.
7:10 Do not be in a hurry to intercede in disputes; And in deciding who is right, do not be angry.
7:11 Do not despise a common man who is in bitterness of spirit; Remember that there is one who lifts up and brings low.
7:12 Do not plow violence against a brother; And so, against a fellow man and friend together.
7:13 Do not delight to tell lie upon lie; For the expectation from that will not be pleasant.
7:14 Do not reveal a secret in the congregation of princes; And do not repeat what you heard from interceding in a dispute.
7:16 Do not reckon yourself among the men of the people; Remember, if they cause trouble, do not be angry.
7:17 Exceedingly bring pride low; For the expectation of common man is the maggot.
7:18 Do not exchange a friend for a price; Nor lend a brother for the gold of Ophir.
7:19 Do not despise a prudent wife; And a well-favored [wife] is above rubies.
7:20 Do not afflict a slave who serves faithfully; Or likewise a hired worker who gives his soul.
7:21 A slave who deals wisely, love as your own soul; Do not withhold freedom from him.
7:22 Do you have a beast? Keep your eyes on it. And if it is trustworthy, establish it.
7:23 Do you have sons? Instruct them. And marry wives to them in their youth.
7:24 Do you have daughters? Guard their flesh. And do not cause your face to shine toward them.
7:25 Give away a daughter and a concern will go away. But give her to a [noble] man of understanding.
7:26 Do you have a wife? Do not be disgusted by her. But a woman who is an enemy, do not trust in her.
7:27 With all your heart, honor your father. And do not forget the birth pangs of your mother.
7:28 Remember that except through them, You would not have been [born]. So what will you give back to them Compared to what they gave to you?
7:29 With all your soul, fear God. And sanctify his priests.
7:30 With all your might, love him who made you. And do not forsake his ministers.
7:31 Glorify God and honor the priest. And give their portion as you were commanded: The bread of the first fruits; and The heave-offering of the hand; and The sacrifices of righteousness; and The heave-offering of the holy things.
7:32 And likewise to the needy, hold out your hand; So that your blessing may be complete.
7:33 Show grace as a gift in the sight of all the living. And likewise to the dead, do not deny kindness.
7:34 Do not put off those who weep, But mourn with those who mourn.
7:35 Do not take away your heart from a friend, Because by doing this you will be loved.
7:36 With all your works remember the end; And you will never be destroyed.
8:1 Do not strive with a great man. Why should you fall into his hand?
8:2 Do not plow against a wealthy man, Or else your price will be weighed. For gold has made many reckless; And wealth will lead astray the hearts of the nobles.
8:3 Do not fight with a man of tongue; And you will not put wood on a fire.
8:4 Do not walk along with a foolish man; Or else he will despise your words.
8:5 Do not shame a man who turns from transgression; Remember that all of us are guilty.
8:6 Do not humiliate an aged [common] man; For we will be numbered among those who grow old.
8:7 Do not boast yourself over him who gave up the ghost; Remember all of us will be taken away.
8:8 Do not forsake the talk of the wise; But even try to figure out their riddles. Because from this you will receive instruction To stand before princes.
8:9 Do not despise what you hear among the gray-headed Which they have heard from their fathers. Because from this you will receive understanding To return an answer in the time you need it.
8:10 Do not kindle with the coal of the wicked; Or else you will be burned with the flame of his fire.
8:11 Do not move away from before the scoffer To set him as an ambusher before you.
8:12 Do not lend to a man stronger than you; And if you lend, [you are] as one who wastes.
8:13 Do not become surety for more than you have left; And if you become surety, [you are] as one who repays.
8:14 Do not enter into judgment against a judge; For he will judge according to his will.
8:15 Do not walk with one who is cruel; Or else you will be made heavy with your evil. For he will go straight before his face; And you will be consumed in his folly.
8:16 Do not harden your forehead with one who is given to anger; And do not ride with him in the way. For blood is as nothing in his eyes; And where there is none to deliver, he will destroy you.
8:17 Do not reveal yourself with one who is silly; For he will not be able to hide your secret.
8:18 Do no secret thing before a stranger; For you do not know to what end he will bring it.
8:19 Do not reveal your heart to all flesh; And you will not drive away the good from you.
9:1 Do not be jealous of the wife of your bosom; Or else you will teach evil concerning yourself.
9:2 Do not be zealous to give your soul to a woman; So that you cause her to walk on your high places.
9:3 Do not come near to a strange woman; Or else you will fall into her snares.
9:4 Do not sleep with a female musician; Or else distracting admiration will burn you.
9:5 Do not think about a virgin; Or else you will be snared by her fines.
9:6 Do not give your soul to a prostitute; Or else you will turn away your inheritance.
9:7 Your eyes will make a fool of yourself in a vision; And you will be made desolate behind her house.
9:8 Hide your eye from a graceful woman; And do not look at beauty that is not yours. On account of a woman many have been destroyed; And so she will burn her lovers with fire.
9:9 Do not taste with her husband; And do not turn away with him drinking. Or else you will incline your heart to her; And your blood will incline to destruction.
9:10 Do not forsake an old friend; For a new one is not acquainted with you. New wine [is like a] new friend; And after it is old, then you will drink it.
9:11 Do not be jealous of a wicked man; For you do not know what his day [will be].
9:12 Do not be jealous of a proud man who prospers; Remember that at the time of death he will not go unpunished.
9:13 Be far from a man who has the authority to kill; And you will not fear the dread of death. And if you have come near, do not be guilty; Or else he will take your breath. Know that you will be marching among snares; And you will be walking on nets.
9:14 According to your ability, answer your fellow man; But with those who are wise, reveal yourself.
9:15 Let what you think be with him who has understanding; And [let] all that is your secret [be] among them.
9:16 Share your bread with righteous men; And let your glory be in the fear of God.
9:17 The wise of hands controls his work; And a ruler [who controls] his people is wise.
9:18 Rash talk is feared on account of a man of tongue; And the burden on his mouth will be hated.
10:1 A judge of a people is one who instructs his people; And the dominion of one who gives understanding will be well ordered.
10:2 A king who goes wild will cause the destruction of a city; And a city will be inhabited by the understanding of its princes.
10:3 As a judge of a people, so are his ambassadors; And as a head of a city, so are its inhabitants.
10:4 In the hand of God is the dominion of all of [noble] man; And in the presence of the lawgiver, he will put his grandeur.
10:5 In the hand of God is the dominion of the world; And a man at the time will stand on it.
10:6 Do not perform evil against a fellow man for all transgression; And do not walk in the way of pride.
10:7 Pride is an enemy to the Lord and to men; And to both of them, oppression is a trespass.
10:8 A kingdom will turn away from nation to nation Because of the violence of pride.
10:9 What is dust and ashes proud about That so long as it lives its nation will be lifted up?
10:10 "A whisper of sickness," complains the one who heals. "A king today - tomorrow will fall."
10:11 In death man will inherit: The maggot and worm, lice and creeping things.
10:12 The beginning of man's pride is [when] he becomes hardened; And of his own heart, he will turn away from what he has done.
10:13 For the reservoir of pride is sin; And the [reservoir's] fountain gushes out wickedness. Therefore God will make his plagues wonderful; And strike him until he is consumed.
10:14 The throne of the proud, God has overthrown; And he seated the poor in their place.
10:16 The footsteps of the nations, God has closed up; And he uprooted them from the bottom layer of earth.
10:17 And he has scraped them from the earth, and plucked them up; And the memory of them ceased from the earth.
10:18 Pride is not seemly for a common man; Nor strong anger for him who is born of a woman.
10:19 What seed is honored of the seed of a common man? The seed is dishonored of him who transgresses the commandments.
10:20 The head among brothers is honored; But he who fears God [is honored] in the eye [of God].
10:22 Sojourner and stranger, foreigner and poor; Their glory is the fear of Yahweh.
10:23 Do not despise the needy who deals wisely; And do not honor any violent man.
10:24 A prince, a ruler, and a judge are honored; But none is greater than one who fears God.
10:25 A slave who deals wisely is lifted up; And a slave who is corrected should not complain.
10:26 Do not become wise to serve your pleasure; And do not honor yourself in the time of your need.
10:27 Better is he who serves and has abundant wealth; Than he who honors himself and lacks a gift.
10:28 My son, in meekness honor your soul; And discretion will be given to you in a similar manner.
10:29 One who causes the condemnation of his own soul, who will justify him? And who will honor one who causes the dishonor of his own soul?
10:30 There is the needy who is honored because of his understanding; And there is he who is honored because of his riches.
10:31 He who honors himself in his poverty; In his riches will honor himself more. And he who is dishonored in his riches; In his poverty will be dishonored more.
11:1 The wisdom of the needy will lift up his head And will seat him among nobles.
11:2 Do not praise man for his form; And do not be disgusted by man for his appearance.
11:3 The bee is worthless among the birds; But her fruit is head of the produce.
11:4 Do not mock at one who wears [only] a loincloth; And do not scorn at a bitter day. For the works of Yahweh are wonderful things; And his work has been hid from man.
11:5 Many who were contrite have sat on a throne; And [those] not on anyone's mind have worn a turban.
11:6 Many who were lifted up have been dishonored greatly; And the honored were given into the hand of the lesser.
11:7 Do not overthrow before you conduct a search; Inquire at first, and afterward rebuke.
11:8 Do not return an answer before you hear; And do not speak out in the middle of [someone] talking.
11:9 When there is no sorrow, do not fret; And when there is strife of the proud, do not rise up.
11:10 My son, why do you increase your oppression? For he who hurries to increase will not go unpunished. My son, surely if you run, you will not arrive; And surely if you seek, you will not find.
11:11 There is one who labors, is weary, and runs; And by doing so, he falls behind.
11:12 There is one who is beaten down, and who perishes in his walk,  Lacking everything and has abundant hardship. But the eye of Yahweh watches him for good; And he shakes him free from the stinking dust.
11:13 He lifts up his head and exalts him; And many are amazed at him.
11:14 Good and evil, life and death, poverty and riches, are from Yahweh.
11:17 The gift of the righteous will stand forever; And his favor will prosper forever.
11:18 There is one who makes himself rich by afflicting himself; And there is one who hides his wages.
11:19 And in time, he says, "I have found rest; And now I will eat from my good things." He does not know when he will pass on; And he leaves it [all] to another and dies.
11:20 My son, stand in your task and be satisfied in it; And grow old in your work.
11:21 Do not be astonished at the works of the sinner; But believe in Yahweh and abide in your toil. For it is a light thing in the sight of Yahweh To quickly and suddenly make the poor rich.
11:22 The blessing of God is the lot of the righteous; And in time, his hope will blossom.
11:23 Do not say, What do I need? And now what good thing is for me?
11:24 Do not say, I have enough with me. And now what evil thing will concern me?
11:25 The goodness of a day makes the evil be forgotten; And the evil of a day makes the goodness be forgotten.
11:27 A time of evil makes delight be forgotten; And the end of man tells concerning him.
11:28 Before death, do not call a [noble] man blessed; For at his end, a man will be recognized.
11:29 Do not bring every man into your house; For how many are the wounds of a scammer!
11:30 Like a bird that is caught in a cage, so is the heart of the proud; And like a spy, he will see your nakedness.
11:31 The whisperer will turn good to evil; And he will set a conspiracy for your pleasant things.
11:32 From a spark, a charcoal increases; And [from] a worthless man, he lies in wait for blood.
11:33 Be afraid of evil, for it brings forth evil. Why should you take a blemish forever?
11:34 Do not stick to the wicked or he will overthrow you; And he will turn you out of your house.
12:1 If you do good, know to whom you are doing good; And there will be hope for your goodness.
12:2 Do good to the righteous and find a reward; If not from him, from Yahweh.
12:3 It is not goodness to support the wicked; And likewise it is not righteousness for him who did so.
12:4 A double portion of evil will overtake you; For all the goodness that reached him.
12:5 Do not give him weapons of war. Why should he turn them against you?
12:6 For God also hates the evil; And to the wicked he will render vengeance.
12:7 Give to good and withhold from evil; Treasure the poor and do not give to the proud.
12:8 A friend will not be known when things are good; And an enemy will not be hidden when things are bad.
12:9 When things are good for a man, even an enemy is a companion; And when things are bad for him, even a companion separates.
12:10 Never trust in an enemy; For like bronze, his evil will corrode.
12:11 And even though he listens to you and walks quietly; Set your heart to be afraid of him. Let him be like a polished mirror; And know that there is no end to the corrosion.
12:12 Do not stand him beside you. Why should he thrust you away and stand in your place? Do not seat him at your right hand. Why should he seek your seat? And at the end, you will grasp my words; And at my sayings, you will sigh.
12:13 Who will show favor to a snake charmer who is bitten? Or to anyone who comes near a beast with strong teeth?
12:14 So is he who joins with a man of pride And wallows in his iniquities.
12:15 As long as you stand, he will not express himself; But if you trip, he will not contain himself.
12:16 With his lips, an adversary tarries; But with his heart, he considers deep pits. And even though he weeps with his eyes; When he finds the [right] time, he will not be filled with blood.
12:17 If evil meets you, he is found there; As a man who [pretends] to uphold you, he will take hold of your heel.
12:18 He will wag his head and wave his hand; And with much whispering, he will change his face.
13:1 He who touches pitch, it will stick to his hand; And he who joins with a scoffer will learn his way.
13:2 Why would you lift what is too heavy for you? Then why join yourself with someone richer than you? Why would a [clay] pot join itself with a [metal] cauldron? When it is snared with it, then it is broken.
13:3 When the rich afflicts, he is proud of himself; But the needy who was wronged, he pleads for mercy.
13:4 If you prosper him, he will be served by you; And if you bow, he will spare you.
13:5 If you have anything, his words will be good with you; But he will impoverish you without him having any pain.
13:6 While he needs you, he will be with you; And he will flatter you, and laugh with you, and make you promises.
13:7 As long as he profits, he will deceive you; Three times he will strip you. And then he will see you and be furious with you; And he will wag his head at you.
13:8 Take heed that you are not too bold; But do not be like those who lack knowledge.
13:9 If a noble comes near, be far; And by doing so, he will bring you near.
13:10 Do not bring yourself near, or else you will be removed; But do not remove yourself, or else you will be hated.
13:11 Do not trust being free with him; And do not believe the multitude of his talking. For his talking so much is a trial; And while he flatters you, he searches you.
13:12 A ruler will give cruelty and will not spare; Over the soul of many, he makes a conspiracy.
13:13 Take heed and be careful; And do not walk with violent men.
13:15 All flesh loves its kind; And all of man [loves] one who is like him.
13:16 All flesh is beside its kind; And man will be joined to his kind.
13:17 Why will a wolf be joined to a lamb? So it is with the wicked to the righteous.
13:18 From a man there can be peace between a hyena and a dog. From where can there be peace between the rich and the poor?
13:19 The lion feeds on wild donkeys in the wilderness; Likewise, the rich pastures on those who are needy.
13:20 Pride is disgusted by meekness; And the rich is disgusted by the needy.
13:21 The rich who slips is upheld by a fellow man; But the needy who is tripped will be driven from one fellow man to another.
13:22 The rich speaks out and his helpers are many. And his repulsive words are made beautiful. The needy is tripped [saying], Reach out! Reach out! And lift me! And he spoke out wisely, but there is no place for him.
13:23 When the rich speaks, all have stopped. And they exalt his understanding to reach the clouds. When the needy speaks, they say, Who is this? And if he has stumbled, they also thrust him away.
13:24 Riches are good if they are without iniquity; And poverty is evil if it comes from pride.
13:25 The heart of a common man will change his face; Whether for good or for evil.
13:26 The footprint of a good heart is a bright face; But a distracted [face] tells of thoughts of trouble.
14:1 Blessed is the common man whose mouth has not grieved him; And whose heart would not bring judgment on him.
14:2 Blessed is the man whose soul has not reduced him; And whose hope has not ceased.
14:3 To the small of heart, riches are not seemly; And to the man who has an evil eye, gold is not seemly.
14:4 He who withholds from his soul will gather for another; And a stranger will squander his good things.
14:5 He who is evil to his soul, to whom will he do good? And he will not meet with his good things.
14:6 He who is evil to his soul, none is more evil; And with him is the reward for his evil.
14:9 In the eye of him who stumbles, his portion is little; And he who takes the portion of his fellow man, wastes his own portion.
14:10 The eye of him with an evil eye pounces on his bread; And there is turmoil at his table.
14:11 My son, do good to yourself if you have the means; And prosper according to the power of your hand.
14:12 Remember that death does not tarry; And the statute to Sheol has been told to you.
14:13 Before you die, do good to a friend; And give to him according to your means.
14:14 Do not withhold from the good things of a day; And in what was acquired, do not pass by.
14:15 Will you not forsake your strength to another? And your labor to those who cast lots?
14:16 Give and take, and enjoy your soul; For there is no seeking of delight in Sheol.
14:17 All flesh becomes old like a garment; And the everlasting statute is, You will surely die.
14:18 As a budding leaf on a green tree, Where one withers and another springs up; So are the generations of flesh and blood, One dies and one is weaned.
14:19 All his works will surely rot; And the work of his hands will draw after him.
14:20 Blessed is the common man who studies in wisdom; And who looks into understanding.
14:21 Who puts her ways on his heart; And who considers her understandings.
14:22 Going out after her in search; And lurking at all her entrances.
14:23 Who looks forth through the window; And is attentive at her doors.
14:24 Who encamps round about her house; And then brings his tent pegs into her wall.
14:25 And stretches out his tent next to her; And then stays a good neighbor.
14:26 And puts his nest in her foliage; And resides in her branches.
14:27 And takes refuge in her shadow from the heat; And stays in her dwelling-places.
15:1 For he who fears Yahweh will do this; And he who takes hold of the law will approach her.
15:2 And then she will meet him like [his] mother; And like the wife of [his] youth, she will receive him.
15:3 And then she will give him the bread of discretion to eat; And she will give him the waters of understanding to drink.
15:4 And then he will lean on her and not be tripped; And he will trust in her and not be ashamed.
15:5 And then she will exalt him above his fellow man; And in the midst of the assembly, she will open his mouth.
15:6 He will find joy and gladness; And she will give him an everlasting name to inherit.
15:7 Men of falsehood will not approach her; And prideful men will not see her.
15:8 She is far from scoffers; And liars will not remember her.
15:9 Praise is not seemly in the mouth of the wicked; For it was not distributed to him from God.
15:10 In the mouth of the wise, praise will be said; And he who rules over it will teach it.
15:11 Do not say, "My transgression is from God." For that which he hates, he does not do.
15:12 Beware that you do not say, "It was he who stumbled me." For there is no need of violent men.
15:13 Yahweh hates disgusting behavior and evil; And he will not let it happen to those who fear him.
15:14 It was he who from the beginning created man; And gave him into the hand of his imagination.
15:15 If it pleases you, you will keep the commandments; And to do his will is understanding.
15:16 Fire and water are poured out before you; In that which pleases you, put forth your hand.
15:17 Life and death are before man; That which pleases him will be given to him.
15:18 The wisdom of Yahweh is sufficient; He is mighty in strength and looks at all things.
15:19 The eyes of God see his works; And it is he who discerns all that a man does.
15:20 He did not command common man to sin; And he did not cause liars to dream.
16:1 Do not desire the form of young men of falsehood; And do not rejoice in sons of wickedness.
16:2 And even though they were fruitful, do not exult in them; If the fear of Yahweh is not with them.
16:3 Do not trust in their life; And do not put confidence in their footsteps. For one is better than a thousand; And to die childless than to have sons of wickedness.
16:4 From one who fears Yahweh, a city will be inhabited; And from a family of betrayers, it will be desolate.
16:5 Many such things has my eye seen; And numerous such things has my ear heard.
16:6 In the congregation of the wicked, a fire is burning; And in a godless nation, wrath is kindled.
16:7 He did not forgive the ancient princes; Those who rebelled in their strength.
16:8 And he did not spare the place where Lot sojourned; Those who were furious in their pride.
16:9 And he did not spare the nation devoted to destruction; Those who were trodden down in their iniquity.
16:10 Likewise [he did not spare] six hundred thousand on foot; Those who were taken away in the pride of their heart.
16:11 And if there is another who is stiff-necked; It would be a wonder if he were to be unpunished. For mercy and anger are with him; And he forgives and pardons, but will pour out his wrath.
16:12 As is the multitude of his mercies, so is his reproof: He will judge a man according to his works.
16:13 The unrighteous will not escape in robbery: And he will not cause the desire of the righteous to cease.
16:14 Everyone who does righteousness has a reward; And everyone will go forth according to his works.
16:17 Do not say, "I am hidden from God; And who will remember me on high? Among a mass of people, I will not be known; And what is my soul among all that have breath? 
16:20 Likewise, he will not set his heart upon me; And who will consider my ways?
16:21 If I have sinned, no eye will see me. Or if I lie, it is all hidden, Who will know?
16:22 My work of righteousness, who will declare it? And what hope is there? For the decree is set." 
16:23 Those who are void of understanding will think these things; And a [noble] man who is silly will consider this.
16:24 Listen to me, my son, and receive my teaching; And upon my words, set your heart.
16:25 I will pour out my spirit by weight, And by measure I will declare my knowledge.
16:26 When God created his works from the beginning, Concerning their life he assigned them portions.
16:27 He set in order his works forever, And their rule from generation to generation. They do not hunger, neither are they weak, And they do not cease from their works.
16:28 Not one presses on his neighbor, They never disobey his word.
16:29 And after these things the Lord looked upon the earth, And filled it with his good things.
16:30 With every living soul he covered the face of it; And into it is their return.
17:1 God created man out of the earth, And returned him into it again.
17:2 Days by number and a set time, he gave them; And he gave them authority over the things upon it.
17:3 As was fitting for them, he clothed them with strength; And in his image he made them.
17:4 And he put the fear of them upon all flesh, And gave them dominion over beasts and birds.
17:5 With insight and understanding, he filled their heart; 
17:6 And taught them good and evil.
17:7 He formed for them tongue, and eyes, and ears, And gave them a heart to understand,
17:8 To show them the majesty of his works, That they might glory in his wonders,
17:9 And might declare the fear of him in the world,
17:10 And praise his holy name.
17:11 He set before them knowledge, And the law of life he gave them for a heritage.
17:12 He made an everlasting covenant with them, And showed them his judgements.
17:13 Their eyes beheld his glorious majesty, And their ear heard his glorious voice.
17:14 And he said to them, Beware of all unrighteousness; And he commanded them, each concerning his neighbor.
17:15 Their ways are ever before him, They are not hid from his eyes.
17:17 For every nation he appointed a ruler, But Israel is the Lord? s portion,
17:19 All their works are clear as the sun before him, And his eyes are continually upon their ways.
17:20 Their iniquities are not hid from him, And all their sins are before the Lord.
17:22 The righteousness of men is to him as a signet, And the mercy of man he preserves as the apple of an eye.
17:23 Afterwards he will rise up and recompense them, And retribution he will bring upon their own head.
17:24 Nevertheless to those who repent he grants a return, And comforts those who lose patience.
17:25 Turn to the Lord and forsake sins, Supplicate before his face and lessen offence.
17:26 Turn to the Most High, and turn away from iniquity, And vehemently hate the disgusting thing.
17:27 For what pleasure does God have in all who perish in the world, Instead of those who live and give him praise?
17:28 Thanksgiving perishes from the dead as from one who does not exist, [But] he who lives and is in health praises the Lord.
17:29 How great is the mercy of the Lord, And [His] forgiveness to those who turn to him.
17:30 For it is not like this in man, Nor is his thought like the thoughts of the sons of men.
17:31 What is brighter than the sun? Yet this fails; And how much more man who [has] the inclination of flesh and blood.
17:32 He looks upon the host of the height of heaven, And [on] all men [who] are earth and ashes.
18:1 He who lives for ever created all things together,
18:2 The Lord alone will be justified.
18:4 To none has he given power to declare his works, Yes, who can trace out his mighty deeds?
18:5 Who can declare the might of his majesty, And who can recount his mercies?
18:6 No man can take [from them] nor add [to them], Nor can any trace out the marvellous acts of the Lord.
18:7 When a man has finished, then he just begins, And when he ceases he is in perplexity.
18:8 What is man, and what profit is there in him? What is the good of him, and what is the evil?
18:9 The number of man? s days Is great [if it reaches] a hundred years;
18:10 As a drop of water from the sea, or [as] a grain of sand, So are [man? s] few years in the day of eternity.
18:11 Therefore is the Lord longsuffering toward them And pours out his mercy upon them.
18:12 He sees and knows that their end is evil, Therefore he increases his forgiveness.
18:13 The mercy of man is upon his neighbor, But the mercy of the Lord is upon all flesh, Reproving, and chastening, and teaching, And bringing back as a shepherd his flock.
18:14 He has mercy on those who accept chastening, And who diligently seek after his judgements.
18:15 My son, do not put a blemish on [your] good deeds, Nor [cause] grief through words in any gift;
18:16 Does not the dew make the burning heat to cease? So a word changes [the character of] a gift.
18:17 For there is a good word which is better than a gift; And both belong to a gracious man.
18:18 A fool upbraids ungraciously, And the gift of envious man consumes the eyes.
18:19 Before you fight, seek a helper; Before you are sick, a physician.
18:20 Before judgement examine yourself, And in the hour of visitation you will find forgiveness.
18:21 Before you fall humble yourself, And in time of sin show repentance.
18:22 Let nothing hinder you from paying your vows in due time, And do not wait until death to be justified.
18:23 Before you vow, prepare your vows, And do not be as one who tempts God.
18:24 Think of the wrath in the latter days, And of the time of vengeance, when he turns away his face.
18:25 Remember the time of famine in the time of plenty, And poverty and want in the days of wealth.
18:26 From morning until evening the time changes, And all things move swiftly before the Lord.
18:27 A wise man is discreet in all things, And in days of sinning keeps himself from offence.
18:28 Every wise man teaches wisdom, And let them who know her give thanks.
18:29 Those who are wise in teaching also show that they are wise In that they pour forth wise proverbs.
18:30 Do not go after your desires, And refrain yourself from your appetites.
18:31 If you grant to your soul the gratification of [her] desire, You will make yourself a cause of rejoicing to your enemies.
18:32 Do not delight yourself in too much luxury, For double is its poverty.
18:33 Do not be a squanderer and a drunkard, Or else there will be nothing in your purse.
19:1 He who does these things will not become rich, And he who despises small things will become altogether naked.
19:2 Wine and women cause the heart to be lustful,
19:3 And a brazen soul will destroy its owner.
19:4 He who trusts others too quickly is unwise, And he who errs sins against his own soul.
19:5 He who has pleasure in evil will be condemned,
19:6 But he who hates talk has the less malice.
19:7 Never repeat a word, Then no one will reproach you;
19:8 Do not speak of it to friend or foe; And, unless it be a sin to you, do not reveal it,
19:9 Lest he who hear it hate you, And regard you as an evildoer.
19:10 Have you heard anything? Let it die with you; Be of good courage it will not burst you.
19:11 A fool travails because of a word, Even as a woman travails because of a child.
19:12 [As] an arrow stuck in the fleshy thigh, So is a word in the belly of a fool.
19:13 Reprove a friend, that he do no evil, And if he has done anything, that he does not do it again.
19:14 Reprove a friend, it may be he did not say it, And if he has said it, that he does not do it again.
19:15 Reprove a friend, yet often there is slander, And do not believe every word.
19:16 One man slips, though not from the soul, And who has not sinned with his tongue.
19:17 Reprove your neighbor, before you threaten, And give place to the law of the Most High.
19:20 All wisdom is the fear of the Lord, And in all wisdom [there is] the fulfilling of the law.
19:22 But the knowledge of wickedness is not wisdom, And the counsel of sinners is not understanding.
19:23 There is a form of wisdom which is abomination, And there is a fool who lacks wisdom.
19:24 Better is one who has inferior understanding, and fears, Than one who is very smart but transgresses the law.
19:25 There is a subtle [form of] craftiness which is unrighteous, And there is one who deceives people with kindness to gain a judgement.
19:26 There is one who walks humbly and mournfully, But inwardly he is full of deceit.
19:27 [There is one] with a downcast look, pretending to be deaf, But when unobserved he will get the better of you;
19:28 And if, for lack of power, he is hindered from sinning, He will do evil when he finds opportunity.
19:29 A man is known by his appearance, And a wise man is known by his face.
19:30 A man? s attire proclaims his deeds, And his footsteps show what he is.
20:1 There is a reproof that is uncalled for, And [there is] he who is silent but wise.
20:2 How good it is to reprove Rather than to be angry;
20:3 And let him who makes confession Be spared humiliation.
20:4 As is a eunuch who sojourns with a virgin, So is he who would do right with violence.
20:5 One keeps silence and is accounted wise, And another is despised for his much talking.
20:6 One keeps silence, having nothing to say; And another keeps silence, for he sees [it is] a time [for silence].
20:7 The wise man is silent until the [proper] time, But the arrogant and the scorner take no note of the time.
20:8 He who is abundant in word is abhorred, And he who takes authority [to speak] is hated.
20:9 [Sometimes] it is advantageous for a man to be in adversity, And there is a gain that turns to loss.
20:10 There is a gift that profits you nothing, And there is a gift that brings a double recompense.
20:11 [Sometimes] there is humiliation through honor, And [sometimes] a man from humiliation comes to honor.
20:12 One buys much for little, Another pays sevenfold.
20:13 A wise man makes himself beloved with few words, But the pleasantries of fools are wasted.
20:14 The gift of a fool does not profit you, For his eyes are many instead of one.
20:15 He gives little and criticizes much, And opens his mouth like a herald. Today he lends and tomorrow he asks it back, Hateful is such a one to God and man.
20:16 The fool says, "I have no friend, And my good deeds receive no thanks, Those who eat my bread are evil with tongue." How often and how many men laugh him to scorn.
20:18 A slip on the pavement is better than [a slip] of the tongue, Thus the fall of the wicked comes swiftly.
20:19 As the fat tail of a sheep eaten without salt, So is a word spoken out of season.
20:20 A parable from the mouth of a fool is rejected, For he utters it out of season.
20:21 One is hindered from sinning through lack [of opportunity], And when he rests he is not troubled.
20:22 Another destroys his soul through [sense of] shame, He loses it through lack of frankness.
20:23 And another, for shame? s sake, promises to a friend, And makes him an enemy without reason.
20:24 A foul blot in a man is a lie, It is [found] continually in the mouth of the ignorant.
20:25 Preferable is a thief to one who continually lies, But both will inherit destruction.
20:26 The disposition of a liar is to be dishonorable, And his shame is ever with him.
20:27 The wise man advances himself in words, And a prudent man pleases the great.
20:28 He who tills his land raises high his heap, And he who pleases the great atones for wrong.
20:29 Presents and gifts blind the eyes of the wise, And as a muzzle on the mouth turn away reproofs.
20:30 Hidden wisdom and concealed treasure, What profit is there in either?
20:31 Better is a man who hides his folly Than a man who hides his wisdom.
21:1 My son, have you sinned? Do not add to it; And make supplication concerning your former sins.
21:2 Flee from sin as from the face of a serpent; For if you come near it, it will bite you; Its teeth are lion's teeth, Slaying the souls of men.
21:3 Like a two-edged sword is all iniquity, From its stroke there is no healing.
21:4 Tyranny and violence destroy wealth, So the house of the arrogant is desolated.
21:5 Supplication from the mouth of a poor man [reaches] to the ears of the Lord, And his vindication comes quickly.
21:6 He who hates reproof [walks] in the path of a sinner, But he who fears the Lord will turn [to him] whole-heartedly.
21:7 The wise discerns him who is before him, And spies out the sinner at once.
21:8 He who builds his house with other men? s money, Is as one gathering stones for his burial mound.
21:9 [Like] flax wrapped together is the gathering of the ungodly, And their end is a flame of fire.
21:10 The way of sinners is made smooth without stones, And at its end is the pit of Hades.
21:11 He who observes the law becomes the master of his natural tendency, And the fear of the Lord is the consummation of wisdom.
21:12 He who is not wise will not be instructed, And there is a wisdom which makes bitterness to abound.
21:13 The knowledge of a wise man abounds like a spring of water, And his counsel is like the water of life.
21:14 The inward parts of a fool are like a broken vessel, He holds no knowledge.
21:15 If an understanding man hears a wise word, He commends it, and adds to it; If a foolish man hears it, he mocks it, And he casts it behind his back.
21:16 The discourse of a fool is like a burden on a journey, But upon the lips of the wise grace is found.
21:17 The utterance of a prudent man is sought for in the assembly. And his words are pondered in the heart.
21:18 As a house that is a prison so is wisdom to a fool, And the knowledge of an unwise man is [as] talk without sense.
21:19 [As] chains on [their] feet, [so] is instruction to the foolish, And as manacles on their right hand.
21:20 The fool lifts up his voice with laughter, But the wise man scarcely smiles in silence.
21:21 As a golden ornament is instruction to the wise, And as a bracelet upon their right arm.
21:22 The foot of a fool hastes into a house, But it is good manners to stand outside.
21:23 The fool through the door looks into a house, But the cautious man demeans himself humbly.
21:24 It is unseemly for one to listen at the door, And the wise man is grieved at the disgrace [of it].
21:25 The lips of babblers [only] repeat the things that are not theirs, But the words of the wise are weighed in the balance.
21:26 The heart of fools is in their mouth, But the mouth of the wise is [in] their heart.
21:27 When the ungodly curses his adversary He curses his own soul.
21:28 The whisperer defiles his own soul, And is hated wherever he sojourns.
22:1 The slothful man is like a filthy stone, And every one flees from its stench.
22:2 A slothful man is like the filth of a dunghill, Everyone who takes it up shakes it out of his hand.
22:3 Shame [there is] to the father who begets an uninstructed [son], And a daughter is born to his loss.
22:4 A prudent daughter is an inheritance to her husband, But she who brings shame is a grief to him who begat her.
22:5 She who is bold brings shame on her father and husband, And she is despised by both.
22:6 [As] music in time of mourning, [so is] unseasonable talk; But stripes and correction are at all times wisdom.
22:7 He who teaches a fool is [as] one who glues together a potsherd, [Or as] one who awakens a sleeper out of a deep sleep.
22:8 He who discourses to a fool is as one discoursing to him who slumbers, And at the end he says, "What is it?" 
22:11 Mourn for the dead, for [his] light has failed, And mourn for a fool, for understanding has failed [him]. Weep gently for the dead, for he has found rest; But the life of a fool is worse than death.
22:12 The mourning for the dead is for seven days, But the mourning for a fool is for all the days of his life.
22:13 Do not talk much with a foolish man, And do not go on the road with a pig, Beware of him lest you have trouble, And you become defiled when he shakes himself; Turn from him and you will find rest, And [so] you will not be wearied with his folly.
22:14 What is heavier than lead, And what is its name but "Fool"?
22:15 Sand and salt and a weight of iron Are easier to bear than a senseless man.
22:16 [As] timber firmly fixed into the wall Is not loosened by an earthquake, So a heart established on well-advised counsel Will not be fearful in time [of danger].
22:17 A heart fixed on thoughtful understanding Is as an ornament graven on a polished wall.
22:18 Small stones lying upon a high place Will not remain against the wind, So will the fearsome heart [full of] foolish imagination Be unable to withstand any terror.
22:19 A wound in the eye makes tears flow, And a wound in the heart severs friendship.
22:20 He who throws stones at birds scares them away, And he who reproaches a friend dissolves friendship.
22:21 Even if you draw the sword against a friend, Do not despair, for there is a way out.
22:22 If you open your mouth against a friend, Do not fear, for there is a [way of] reconciliation; But reproach, arrogance, betrayal of a secret, and a deceitful blow, In these every friend will depart.
22:23 Support your neighbor in poverty, That in his prosperity you may rejoice; Remain steadfast to him in time of [his] affliction, That you may be heir with him in his inheritance.
22:24 Before the fire is the vapor of the furnace and smoke, So revilings before bloodshed.
22:25 Do not be ashamed of a friend who becomes poor, And do not hide yourself from his face;
22:26 And if evil happens to him through you, Whoever hears it will beware of you.
22:27 O that one would set a watch over my mouth, And a seal of shrewdness upon my lips, That I do not fall by means of them, And that my tongue does not destroy me.
23:1 O that one would set scourges over my mind, And the discipline of wisdom over my heart,
23:2 That they do not spare me for my ignorances, And do not overlook my sins;
23:3 That my ignorances not be multiplied, And that my sins do not abound, Lest I fall in the sight of my adversaries, And my enemy rejoice over me.
23:4 O Lord, Father, and Master of my life, Do not abandon me to their counsel.
23:5 Do not give me a proud look, And turn away lust from me.
23:6 May the lust of the body not overtake me, And do not give me over to a shameless soul.
23:7 Hear, my children, [concerning] the discipline of the mouth, He who keeps [it] will not be ensnared;
23:8 But the sinner is ensnared by his lips, And the fool stumbles through his mouth.
23:9 Do not accustom your mouth to an oath, And do not make a habit of naming the Holy One.
23:10 For as a servant who is continually scourged Does not lack [the marks of] a blow, So he who swears and continually names [the Holy One] Is not cleansed from sin.
23:11 A man of many oaths is filled with iniquity, And the scourge does not depart from his house; If he offends his sin will be upon him, And if he disregards it he sins doubly; And if he swears without need he will not be justified, And his house will be filled with calamities.
23:12 There is a manner of speech that is to be compared with death, Do not let it be found in the heritage of Jacob. He who keeps his soul from this will live, And not wallow in sins.
23:13 Do not accustom your mouth to vulgar speech, For there is a sinful thing in that.
23:14 Remember your father and your mother When you sit in council among the mighty, Lest you stumble among them, And show yourself a fool in your manner [of speech], And wish you had not been born, And curse the day of your birth.
23:15 A man who is accustomed to disgraceful talk Will not learn wisdom all his days.
23:16 Two types [of men] multiply sins, And a third brings wrath: A lustful soul burning like fire, Which is not quenched until it is consumed; A fornicator in the body of his flesh, For he does not cease until the fire consumes him;
23:17 [And] the fornicator to whom all bread is sweet, For he will not leave off until he dies.
23:18 [There is] a man who goes astray from his own bed, And says in his soul: "Who sees me? Darkness is around me, and the walls hide me, And no man sees me, of what shall I be afraid? The Most High does not remember my sins."
23:19 And he does not perceive that the eyes of the Lord Are ten thousand times brighter than the sun, Beholding all the ways of men, And looking into secret places.
23:20 For all things are known to him before they are created, So also [he sees them] after they are perfected;
23:21 Such a man will be punished in the streets of the city, And, where he does not suspect it, will be taken.
23:22 So also a wife who leaves her husband, And brings in an heir by a stranger;
23:23 First, she is disobedient to the law of the Most High, Second, she trespasses against her own husband, Third, she commits adultery through her fornication, And brings in children by a stranger.
23:24 She will be led into the assembly, And upon her children there will be visitation.
23:25 Her children will not spread out their roots, And her branches will bear no fruit.
23:26 She will leave her memory for a curse, And her reproach will not be blotted out.
23:27 And those who are left behind will know That nothing is better than the fear of the Lord, And nothing sweeter than to observe The commandments of the Lord.
24:1 Wisdom praises her own soul, And is honored in the midst of her people.
24:2 She opens her mouth in the assembly of the Most High, And is honored in the presence of his hosts.
24:3 "I came forth from the mouth of the Most High, And as a mist I covered the earth.
24:4 In the high places I fixed my abode, And my throne was in the pillar of cloud.
24:5 Alone I compassed the circuit of heaven, And in the depth of the abyss I walked.
24:6 In the waves of the sea, and in all the earth, And in every people and nation I gained a possession.
24:7 With all these I sought a resting place, And [said], In whose inheritance shall I lodge?
24:8 Then the Creator of all things gave me a commandment, And he who created me fixed my dwelling place, And he said, In Jacob let your dwelling place be, And in Israel take up your inheritance.
24:9 He created me from the beginning, before the world; And I will never fail.
24:10 In the holy tabernacle I ministered before him, Moreover, in Zion I was established.
24:11 Likewise in the beloved city he caused me to rest, And in Jerusalem was my authority.
24:12 And I took root among an honored people, In the portion of the Lord, and of his inheritance.
24:13 I was exalted like a cedar in Libanus, And like a cypress on the mountains of Hermon.
24:14 I was exalted like a palm tree on the seashore, And as rose plants in Jericho; And as a fair olive tree in the plain; Yes, I was exalted as a plane tree by the waters.
24:15 As cassia and camel's thorn I have given a scent of perfumes, And as choice myrrh I spread abroad a pleasant odor; As galbanum, and onyx, and stacte; [I was] as the smoke of incense in the Tabernacle.
24:16 I, as a terebinth, spread forth my branches, And my branches were branches of glory and grace.
24:17 As a vine I put forth grace, And my flowers are the fruit of glory and wealth.
24:19 Come to me, you<sup><small>+</small></sup> who desire me, And be<sup><small>+</small></sup> filled with my produce.
24:20 For my memorial is sweeter than honey, And the possession of me than honeycomb.
24:21 Those who eat me still hunger [for me], And those who drink me still thirst [for me].
24:22 He who obeys me will not be ashamed, And those who serve me will not commit sin."
24:23 All these things are the book of the covenant of God Most High, The law which Moses commanded [as] a heritage for the assemblies of Jacob.
24:25 Which fills [men] with wisdom, like Pison, And like Tigris in the days of new [fruits];
24:26 Which overflows, like Euphrates, with understanding, And as Jordan in the days of harvest;
24:27 Which pours forth, as the Nile, instruction, And as Gihon in the days of vintage.
24:28 The first [man] did not know her perfectly, So also the last will not trace her out;
24:29 For her understanding is more abundant than the sea, And her counsel is greater than the deep.
24:30 And as for me, I [was] as a stream from the river, And I came forth as a conduit into a garden;
24:31 I said, "I will water my garden, I will abundantly water my garden beds"; And look, my stream became a river, And my river became a sea.
24:32 Yet again I will bring instruction to light as the morning, And will make these things shine forth afar off.
24:33 Yet again I will pour forth doctrine as prophecy, And leave it for eternal generations.
24:34 Look<sup><small>+</small></sup> [and see], that I have not labored for myself only, But for all those who diligently seek her.
25:1 Three things my soul has desired, And they are lovely in the sight of the Lord and of men: The concord of brethren, and the friendship of neighbors, And a wife and a husband suited to each other.
25:2 Three types [of men] my soul hates, And I am greatly offended at their life, The poor man who is arrogant and the rich man who is deceitful, And an old man who is an adulterer.
25:3 [If] in your youth you have not gathered, How will you find in your old age?
25:4 How beautiful to gray hairs is judgement, And for elders to know counsel.
25:5 How beautiful is the wisdom of old men, And thought and counsel to those who are honored.
25:6 The crown of the aged is their long experience, And their glorying is the fear of the Lord.
25:7 Nine I have conceived of, I accounted blessed, And a tenth I will speak of with my tongue: A man who has joy of his children, Who lives and sees the fall of his enemies.
25:8 Blessed is the husband of an understanding wife, Who does not plough with ox and donkey. Blessed is he who has not slipped with his tongue, And he who has not served an inferior.
25:9 Blessed is the man who has found prudence, And discourses to ears that listen.
25:10 How great is he who finds wisdom, But he is not above him who fears the Lord.
25:11 The fear of the Lord surpasses everything, He who holds it, to whom shall he be likened? 
25:13 Any wound, only not a heart wound. Any wickedness, only not the wickedness of a woman!
25:14 Any calamity, only not the calamity of haters! Any vengeance, only not the vengeance of enemies!
25:15 There is no poison above the poison of a serpent, And there is no wrath above the wrath of a woman.
25:16 I would rather dwell with a lion and a dragon, Than dwell with a wicked woman.
25:17 The wickedness of a woman changes her appearance, And darkens her countenance like a bear's.
25:18 In the midst of his friends her husband sits, And involuntarily he sighs bitterly.
25:19 [There is] little malice like the malice of a woman, May the lot of the wicked fall upon her.
25:20 As a sandy hill to the feet of the aged, So is a woman of tongue to a quiet man.
25:21 Do not fall through the beauty of a woman, And do not be ensnared by what she possesses;
25:22 For hard slavery and a disgrace it is, [If the possessions of] a wife support her husband.
25:23 Hands that hang down, and palsied knees For a wife that does not make her husband happy.
25:24 From a woman sin originated, And because of her we all must die.
26:1 A good wife, blessed is her husband, The number of his days is doubled.
26:2 A worthy wife cherishes her husband, And he fulfills the years of his life in peace.
26:3 A good wife is a good portion; She will be given as a portion to those who fear the Lord.
26:4 [Whether] rich or poor, his heart is cheerful, And his face is merry at all times.
26:5 Of three things my heart is afraid, And concerning a fourth I am in great fear: Slander in the city, an assembly of the multitude, And a false accusation; worse than death are they all;
26:6 Grief of heart and sorrow is a wife jealous of another; The scourge of the tongue are they all.
26:7 A hard yoke is a wicked woman; He who takes hold of her is as one grasping a scorpion.
26:8 A drunk woman causes great wrath; She does not cover her own shame.
26:9 The whoredom of a woman is in the lifting up of her eyes. And she is known by her eyelids.
26:10 Upon a headstrong daughter keep watch, Lest, finding liberty, she uses it for herself.
26:11 Look well after a shameless eye, And do not marvel if it trespasses against you;
26:12 As a thirsty traveller opens his mouth, And drinks of any water that is near, So she sits down at every tent peg, And opens her quiver to any arrow.
26:13 The grace of a wife delights her husband, And her understanding fattens his bones.
26:14 A silent woman is a gift from the Lord, And a well instructed soul is beyond worth.
26:15 Grace upon grace is a modest woman, And there is no weight [of gold] worth a self-controlled soul.
26:16 [As] the sun rising in the highest places of the Lord, [So] also is the beauty of a good wife in the ordering of her house.
26:17 [As] the lamp shining on the holy candlestick, [So] also is the beauty of a face upon a stately figure.
26:18 [As] the golden pillars upon the silver base, [So] also are beautiful feet upon firm heels.
26:28 For two things my heart is grieved, And for a third wrath comes upon me: A rich man who has become poor, And men of understanding if they are despised, And one who turns from righteousness to sin; The Lord will prepare a sword for him.
26:29 With difficulty the merchant keeps himself from wrongdoing, And a huckster will not be acquitted of sin.
27:1 Many have sinned for the sake of gain, And he who seeks to multiply [gains] turns away his eye.
27:2 [As] a nail sticks fast between the joinings of stones, [So] does sin thrust itself in between buying and selling.
27:3 If a man does not hold diligently to the fear of the Lord, His house will be swiftly overthrown.
27:4 When a sieve is shaken the refuse remains, So [it is with] the filth of a man in his reasoning.
27:5 The potter? s vessel is proved in the furnace. And the test of a man is by means of examining him.
27:6 According to the cultivation of a tree so is its yield, [So] the thought of a man according to his nature.
27:7 Praise no man before taking stock of him, For by taking stock of man he is discerned.
27:8 If you follow after righteousness you will attain, And put it on as a robe of glory.
27:9 Birds dwell with their kind, And truth returns to those who practice it.
27:10 The lion waits for its prey, So does sin for those who work iniquity.
27:11 The discourse of the godly is always wisdom, But the fool changes as the moon.
27:12 In the midst of fools closely watch the time, But with a man who is thoughtful abide continually.
27:13 The discourse of fools is an annoyance, And their laughter is sinful wantonness.
27:14 The oath of the godless makes the hair stand on end, And their strife [makes] a man plug his ears.
27:15 A shedding of blood is the strife of the proud, And their abuse is grievous to hear.
27:16 He who reveals secrets destroys trust, And will find no friend to his soul.
27:17 Love a friend and keep faith with him, But if you reveal his secrets do not follow after him;
27:18 For as a man who has destroyed his enemy, So have you destroyed the friendship of your neighbor.
27:19 And as a bird which you have released out of your hand, So have you let your neighbor go, and you will not catch him again.
27:20 Do not pursue him, for he is too far gone, And has escaped like a gazelle from a snare.
27:21 For a wound may be bound up, and for slander there is reconciliation, But he who reveals secrets has no hope.
27:22 He who winks with his eye plans evil things, And he who knows him keeps far from him.
27:23 Before your eyes his mouth will speak sweetly, And he will marvel at your words; But afterward he will alter his mouth, And with your words will make a stumbling block.
27:24 Many things I hate, but nothing like him, And the Lord will hate him too.
27:25 He who casts a stone on high casts it upon his own head, And a deceitful blow apportions wounds to the deceiver.
27:26 He who digs a pit will fall into it, And he who sets a snare will be taken in it.
27:27 He who does evil things, they will roll back upon him, And he will not know from where they came to him.
27:28 Mockery and reproach [come] from the proud, And vengeance, like a lion, lies in wait for them.
27:29 Those who rejoice in the fall of the godly will be taken in a snare, And torment will consume them before their death.
27:30 Wrath and anger, these also are abominations, And a sinful man takes possession of them.
28:1 He who takes vengeance will find vengeance from the Lord, And he will closely observe his sins.
28:2 Forgive an injury [done to you] by your neighbor, And then, when you pray, your sins will be forgiven.
28:3 One man cherishes wrath against another, And does he seek healing from the Lord?
28:4 Upon a man like himself he has no mercy, And for his own sins does he make supplication?
28:5 He being flesh nourishes wrath, Who will make atonement for his sins?
28:6 Remember your last end and cease from enmity; [Remember] corruption and death, and abide in the commandments.
28:7 Remember the commandments, and do not be wrathful with your neighbor; And [remember] the covenant of the Most High, and overlook ignorance.
28:8 Keep far from strife, and sins will keep far from you, For a passionate man kindles strife;
28:9 And a sinful man troubles friends, And casts enmity in the midst of the peaceful.
28:10 According to its fuel so does a fire burn, And according to the stubbornness of a strife so does it increase; And according to the power of a man so is his wrath, And according to his wealth so does he increase his wrath.
28:11 Strife begun in haste kindles a fire, And a hasty quarrel leads to bloodshed.
28:12 If you blow upon a spark it kindles, and if you spit upon it, it is quenched; And both come forth from your mouth.
28:13 Curse the whisperer and the double-tongued, For he has destroyed many who were at peace.
28:14 The third tongue has shaken many, And has dispersed them from nation to nation; Even strong cities it has destroyed, And overturned the houses of the great.
28:15 The third tongue has cast out brave women, And deprived them of their labors;
28:16 He who gives heed to it will not find rest, Neither will he dwell in quiet.
28:17 The stroke of a whip makes a mark, But the stroke of a tongue breaks bones.
28:18 Many have fallen by the edge of the sword, But not so many as have fallen by the tongue;
28:19 Happy is the man who is sheltered from it, Who has not passed through its wrath, Who has not drawn its yoke, And who has not been bound with its bands.
28:20 For its yoke is a yoke of iron, And its bands are bands of brass;
28:21 The death of it is an evil death, And Hades is more profitable than it.
28:22 [But] it has no power over the godly, They will not be burned in her flame;
28:23 Those who forsake the Lord will fall into it, And she will burn them, and not be quenched; As a lion she will be sent upon them, And as a leopard she will destroy them.
28:24 See that you hedge your possession about with thorns; And for your mouth make a door and a bar.
28:25 Bind up your silver and gold; And make a balance and weight for your words.
28:26 Take heed that you do not slip by it, Lest you fall before him who ensnares.
29:1 He who lends to his neighbor shows kindness, And he who strengthened him with his hand keeps the commandments.
29:2 Lend to your neighbor in time of his need, And repay your neighbor at the appointed time.
29:3 Confirm your word, and keep faith with him; And [so] will you always have what you need.
29:4 Many have reckoned a loan as a windfall, And have brought trouble on those who helped them.
29:5 Until he receives it he kisses your hand, And speaks humbly about his neighbor? s money; But when payment is due he prolongs the time, And returns heavy words, and complains of [the shortness of] the time.
29:6 And if he is able [to repay], with difficulty he will receive half, And counts it as a windfall; And if not [able to repay], he has deprived him of his money, And has made him an enemy without cause. With cursings and railings he repays him, And instead of honor he repays him with insult.
29:7 Many have turned away [from lending] because of wickedness, They feared to be defrauded for nothing.
29:8 Nevertheless with the lowly man be longsuffering, And do not let him wait for alms.
29:9 Help the poor for the commandment? s sake, And do not grieve for the loss.
29:10 Lose money for a brother or a friend? s sake, And do not let it rust under a stone or a wall.
29:11 Lay up your treasure according to the commandments of the Most High, And it will profit you more than gold.
29:12 Store up alms in your store-chambers, And it will deliver you from all affliction;
29:13 Better than a mighty shield and a heavy spear Will this avail you against an enemy.
29:14 A good man becomes surety for his neighbor, But he who has lost his sense of shame fails him.
29:15 The kindness of a surety do not forget, For he has given his soul for you.
29:16 A sinner destroys the estate of a surety,
29:17 And he who is of an ungrateful mind fails him who delivered him.
29:18 Suretyship has undone many who were prospering, And has tossed them about as a wave of the sea. Wealthy men it has driven from their homes, And they wandered among strange nations.
29:19 The sinner who falls in his suretyship  And tries to get out of it, falls into judgements.
29:20 Help your neighbor according to your power, And take heed to yourself that you do not fall.
29:21 The chief requisites for life are water and bread, And a garment, and a house to cover nakedness.
29:22 Better the life of a poor man under a shelter of logs, Than sumptuous food among strangers.
29:23 Be content with little or much,
29:24 It is an evil life going from house to house, For where one is a sojourner, One does not open the mouth;
29:25 You are a stranger and drink contempt; Besides this you will bear bitter things:
29:26 "Come here, sojourner, furnish the table, And if there is anything in your hand, feed me";
29:27 [Or]: "Get out, sojourner, from the presence of honor, My brother has come as my guest, I need my house!"
29:28 These things are grievous to a man who has understanding: Upbraiding [concerning] sojourning, and the reproach of a money lender.
30:1 He who loves his son will continue to spank him, That he may have joy of him at the last.
30:2 He who chastises his son will have profit of him, And in the midst of his acquaintances he will have glory of him.
30:3 He who teaches his son will provoke his enemy to jealousy, And before friends will he exult over him.
30:4 When his father dies [it is] as though he did not die, For he has left behind him one like him.
30:5 In his life he saw and rejoiced, And in his death he was not grieved.
30:6 Against [his] enemies he has left an avenger, And to [his] friends one who repays favor.
30:7 He who pampers his son will bind up his wounds, And his heart is troubled at every cry.
30:8 An unbroken horse becomes stubborn, And a son left at large becomes headstrong.
30:9 Coddle your child, and he will terrify you; Play with him [continually], and he will grieve you.
30:10 Do not laugh with him lest he cause you pain, And at the last you gnash with your teeth.
30:11 Do not let him have independence in his youth, And do not ignore his mischievous acts.
30:12 As a python pounces upon a wild beast, So chastise his loins while he is yet young; Bow down his head in his youth, And spank him while he is yet small, Lest he become stubborn and rebel against you, And there be born to you vexation of spirit from him.
30:13 Control your son, and make his yoke heavy, Lest in his folly he lift himself up against you.
30:14 Better is a poor man healthy in body, Than a rich man stricken in his flesh.
30:15 I desire life in health rather than fine gold, And a cheerful spirit rather than pearls.
30:16 There is no wealth above the wealth of health; And there is no good above [that of] a sound heart.
30:17 Better is death than a life of vanity, And eternal rest than continual pain.
30:18 Good things poured out before a closed mouth Are like an offering placed before an idol;
30:19 What does it profit the idols of the nations Which neither eat nor smell? So is he who has wealth, But cannot enjoy it;
30:20 He sees it with his eyes, and groans, As a eunuch who embraces a maiden.
30:21 Do not give your soul to sorrow, And do not be worried in your own counsel.
30:22 Joy of heart is life to a man, And happiness in a man prolongs days.
30:23 Enjoy your soul and cheer your heart, And put vexation far from you; For sorrow has killed many, And there is no profit in vexation.
30:24 Envy and anger shorten days, And anxiety makes gray before the time.
30:25 The sleep of him who is of a cheerful heart is like dainties, And his food agrees with him.
31:1 Watching over wealth is a weariness to the flesh, And the worry of it disturbs sleep.
31:2 The worry of [getting] sustenance disturbs slumber, And drives away sleep more than severe sickness.
31:3 The rich man labors in gathering wealth, And if he rests it is to gather luxuries,
31:4 The poor man toils to the lessening of his house, And if he rests he becomes needy.
31:5 He who runs after gold will not be guiltless, And he who loves gain will go astray by it.
31:6 There are many who have been entangled through gold, And those who put their trust in pearls [have been ensnared].
31:7 It is a stumbling-block for the foolish, And the simpleton is ensnared by it.
31:8 Blessed is the man who is found perfect, Who has not gone astray after mammon.
31:9 Who is he, that we may call him blessed? For he has done a wonderful thing among his people.
31:10 Who has been tested by it, and has remained unharmed? Let it be [accounted] to him for honor. Who might have fallen away, and did not fall away, And might have inflicted harm on his neighbor, but would not?
31:11 Therefore his prosperity will abide, And the assembly will declare his praise.
31:12 My son, if you sit at a great man's table, Do not be greedy upon it. Do not say: "There is plenty here!"
31:13 Remember that an evil eye is an evil thing; God has created nothing more evil than the [evil] eye, Therefore it weeps because of all things;
31:14 Honor your neighbor as yourself, And think over whatever may be distasteful to you.
31:15 Do not stretch out your hand at that which he looks at, And do not reach your hand with his into the dish;
31:16 Eat like a man what is set before you, And do not eat greedily lest you be despised.
31:17 Cease first for the sake of manners, And do not gobble lest you cause disgust.
31:18 And when you sit among many, Do not stretch out your hand before your neighbor.
31:19 Of a truth, a little suffices for a sensible man, Then on his bed he does not groan.
31:20 Pain and sleeplessness, distress and want of breath, And griping, are the lot of a foolish man; There is healthy sleep for moderate eating; He rises in the morning and his soul is with him.
31:21 But if you are oppressed with [eating] dainties, Arise and vomit, so will you have ease.
31:22 Hearken, my son, and do not despise me, And in the end you will understand my words, In all your acts be moderate, And then no harm will touch you.
31:23 He who is seemly sitting at meat will receive honor, The testimony of his good behavior stands secure.
31:24 He who misbehaves sitting at meat will be talked of in the gate, And the testimony of his evil stands secure.
31:25 Moreover, when at wine, exercise restraint, For wine has destroyed many.
31:26 Like a furnace which tries the work of the blacksmith, So is wine in the quarrelling of scorners.
31:27 Like living water is wine to man, If he drinks it in moderation. What life has a man who lacks new wine? It was created from the beginning for gladness.
31:28 Joy of heart, gladness and delight, Is wine drunk at the [right] time and in sufficiency.
31:29 Headache, derision, and shame, Is wine drunk in strife and anger.
31:30 Much wine is a snare to the fool, It diminishes strength and increases wounds.
31:31 At a banquet of wine do not rebuke a friend, And do not grieve him in his merriment. Do not speak to him a reproachful word, And do not quarrel with him before others.
32:1 Have they made you ruler [of the feast], Do not be lifted up, Be to them as one of themselves; Consider them [first], and then take your seat;
32:2 Prepare for their wants [first], and then recline, That you may rejoice on their account, And enjoy honor for organizing it.
32:3 Speak, O elder, for this is your part, Yet with discerning discretion, and do not hinder the singing;
32:4 When the music begins do not pour forth talk, And do not display your wisdom when it is not wanted.
32:5 As a ruby signet in a work of gold, So is good music at a banquet of wine.
32:6 A setting of gold with an emerald signet Is the melody of music at pleasant wine-drinking.
32:7 Speak, young man, if you are constrained [to do so], If asked twice or even thrice;
32:8 Sum up your speech, say much in little, Be as one who knows and can keep silent.
32:9 Among elders do not assert yourself, And among the noble do not be perpetually talking.
32:10 Before hail speeds the lightning, And before the modest speeds favor.
32:11 At the time of departure do not be the last, Depart home and be done with your pleasure.
32:12 But if anything comes into your heart, speak, In the fear of God, and not in senselessness.
32:13 For all these things bless your Maker, Who satisfies you with his goodness.
32:14 He who seeks God receives discipline, And he who seeks him early obtains favor.
32:15 He who seeks the law will gain it, But the hypocrite will be ensnared by it.
32:16 He who fears the Lord discerns judgement, And causes guiding lights to go forth from darkness;
32:17 The violent man shuns reproofs, And wrests the law to suit his need.
32:18 A man of counsel does not hide his understanding, But the proud and scornful man will not accept the law.
32:19 Do nothing without counsel, That you do not repent your act.
32:20 Do not walk in a path set with snares, That you do not stumble twice at an obstacle.
32:21 Do not be confident on a journey regarding robbers,
32:22 And in your paths be wary.
32:23 In whatsoever you do take heed to your soul, For he who does this keeps the commandment.
32:24 He who keeps the law guards himself, And he who trusts in the Lord will not be ashamed.
33:1 No evil befalls him who fears the Lord, But in temptation he will deliver him.
33:2 He is not wise who hates the law, And is tossed about like a ship in a storm.
33:3 A man of understanding discerns the word, And the law is faithful as the inquiry of Urim.
33:4 Prepare your speech, and so let yourself be heard, Bind up instruction, and [then] make your answer.
33:5 [Like] a cart wheel is the heart of a fool, And as a turning axle his [way of] thought.
33:6 Like a saddled horse is the love of a fool, He neighs under everyone who sits upon him.
33:7 Why is one day distinguished from another, When the light of every day in the year is from the sun?
33:8 By the knowledge of the Lord they were distinguished, And he varied seasons and feasts.
33:9 Some of them he exalted and hallowed, And some of them he made ordinary days.
33:10 And all men are from the ground, And Adam was created of earth.
33:11 In the abundance of his knowledge the Lord distinguished them, And made their ways various.
33:12 Some of them he blessed and exalted, And some of them he sanctified and brought near to himself; Some of them he cursed and humbled, And overthrew them from their place.
33:13 As the clay of the potter in his hand, All his ways are according to his good pleasure; So men are in the hand of him who made them, To render to them according to his judgement.
33:14 Opposite evil [is] good, and opposite death [is] life; Likewise opposite the godly [is] the sinner.
33:15 Even thus look upon all the works of the Most High, They are in pairs, one opposite the other.
33:16 And I came at the last, As one who gleans after the grape-gatherers. By the blessing of the Lord I made progress, And, as a grape-gatherer, filled my winepress.
33:17 Consider that I did not labor for myself alone, But for all those who seek instruction.
33:18 Hearken to me, you<sup><small>+</small></sup> great ones of the people, And you<sup><small>+</small></sup> rulers of the congregation, give ear to me.
33:19 To son or wife, to brother or friend, Do not give power over you while you live; And do not give your goods to another, Lest you repent, and ask for them [back].
33:20 While you yet live, and breath is in you, Do not give yourself to any.
33:21 For it is better that your children ask of you, Than you should look to the hand of your sons.
33:22 In all your works keep the upper hand, Let no stain come upon your honor.
33:23 In the day that you end your life, In the day of death, distribute your inheritance.
33:24 Fodder, and a stick, and burdens, for a donkey; Bread, and discipline, and work, for a servant.
33:25 Set your servant to work, and he will seek rest, Leave his hands idle, and he will seek liberty.
33:27 Put him to work that he may not be idle; For idleness teaches much mischief.
33:28 Set him to [such] works as are suited to him, And if he does not obey make his fetters heavy.
33:29 Do not be excessive toward any creature, And do nothing without judgement.
33:30 If you have but one servant, let him be as yourself, For with blood have you obtained him.
33:31 If you have but one servant, treat him as your brother, For as your own soul you have need of him; If you maltreat him, and he departs and runs away, Which way will you go to seek him?
34:1 He who seeks vanity finds delusion, And dreams give wings to fools.
34:2 As one who catches a shadow and pursues the wind, So is he who trusts in dreams.
34:3 A dream is like a mirror, The likeness of a face reflecting a face.
34:4 What can be made clean from an unclean thing? And how can that which is true come from a lie?
34:5 Divinations, and soothsayings, and dreams are vain, As you hope so does your heart see.
34:6 If they are not sent by the Most High in a visitation, Do not give your heart to them.
34:7 For dreams have led many astray, And they have fallen, trusting in them.
34:8 Without deceit the law will be fulfilled; And wisdom in the mouth of one who is faithful is perfection.
34:9 A well-instructed man knows many things, And one of much experience expounds knowledge.
34:10 He who has no experience knows [but] few things,
34:11 But he who has wandered multiplies his skill.
34:12 I have seen many things in my travels, And many things have befallen me;
34:13 Often I was in danger even to death, But was saved thanks to these things.
34:14 The spirit of those who seek the Lord will live,
34:15 For their hope is on him who saves them,
34:16 He who fears the Lord will not be afraid, He will not lose courage, for he is his hope.
34:17 Blessed is the soul of him who fears the Lord;
34:18 On whom does he trust? And who is his stay?
34:19 The eyes of the Lord are upon those who love him, A mighty protection and a strong stay, A shelter from the scorching wind, a shelter from the midday sun, A guard from stumbling, a help from falling;
34:20 One who refreshes the soul and lightens the eyes, Who gives healing, and life, and blessing.
34:21 The sacrifice of an unrighteous man is a mocking sacrifice,
34:22 And the oblations of the wicked are not acceptable.
34:23 The Most High has no pleasure in the offerings of the ungodly, Neither is he pacified for sins by the multitude of sacrifices.
34:24 [As] one who slays a son in the sight of his father, [So] is he who brings a sacrifice from the belongings of the poor.
34:25 The bread of the needy is the life of the poor, He who deprives him of it is a man of blood.
34:26 He slays his neighbor who takes away his [means of] living,
34:27 And a shedder of blood is he who deprives the hired worker of his wages.
34:28 One building, and another pulling down, What profit have they but [useless] labor?
34:29 One praying, and another cursing, To whose voice will the Master listen?
34:30 He who washes after [contact with] a dead body, and touches it again, What profit does he have by his washing?
34:31 So a man fasting for his sins, And going again and doing the same, Who will hearken to his prayer? And what has he profited by humiliating himself?
35:1 He who keeps the law multiplies offerings,
35:2 And he who gives heed to the commandments sacrifices a peace-offering.
35:3 He who renders kindness offers fine flour,
35:4 And he who gives alms sacrifices a thanksgiving offering.
35:5 A pleasing thing to the Lord it is to depart from wickedness, And a propitiation it is to turn away from unrighteousness.
35:6 Do not appear in the presence of the Lord empty,
35:7 For all these things [are due] because of the commandment.
35:8 The offering of a righteous man makes the altar fat, And the sweet savor therefore [is] before the Most High.
35:9 The sacrifice of a righteous man is acceptable, And the memorial of it will not be forgotten.
35:10 With a good eye glorify the Lord, And do not hold back the offerings of your hands.
35:11 In all your works let your countenance beam, And with gladness sanctify your tithe.
35:12 Give to God according to his gift to you, With a good eye and according as your hand has prospered;
35:13 For he is a God of recompense, And sevenfold he will recompense you.
35:14 Do not bribe [him], for he will not accept [gifts],
35:15 And do not trust in a sacrifice of extortion; For he is a God of justice, And with him there is no partiality.
35:16 He will not respect the person of the poor, But hearkens to the supplications of the distressed.
35:17 He does not ignore the cry of the orphan, Nor the widow when she pours out her complaint.
35:18 Does not the tear run down upon the cheek?
35:19 And [is there not] a sigh against him who causes it to run down?
35:20 [Such] a sigh is a bitterness accepted [of God], And [such] a cry reaches to the clouds.
35:21 The cry of the poor passes through the clouds, And until it reaches [God] it does not rest; It will not cease until God visits,
35:22 And the righteous Judge executes judgement. Yes, the Lord will not tarry, And the Mighty One will not refrain himself, Until he smites the loins of the merciless,
35:23 And repays vengeance on the arrogant; Until he takes away the sceptre of pride, And wholly destroys the staff of wickedness;
35:24 Until he renders to a man [according to] his deed, And recompenses him [according to] his thought;
35:25 Until he pleads the cause of his people, And makes them glad with his salvation.
35:26 Mercy is fitting in the time of their affliction, As rain in the time of drought.
36:1 Save us, O God of all,
36:2 And cast your fear upon all the nations.
36:3 Shake your hand against the strange people, That they may see your power.
36:4 As you have sanctified yourself in us before their eyes, So sanctify yourself in them before our eyes;
36:5 That they may know, even as we know, That there is no other God but you.
36:6 Renew the signs, and repeat the wonders, Make glorious your hand and your right arm.
36:7 Awaken wrath, and pour out indignation, Subdue the foe, and drive out the enemy.
36:8 Hasten the end, and ordain the appointed time, For who may say to you:? What are you doing??
36:9 Let him who escapes be devoured in raging fire, And may those who wrong your people find destruction.
36:10 Bring to nothing the head of the princes of Moab, Who says, "There is none beside me."
36:11 Gather all the tribes of Jacob, That they may receive their inheritance, as in days of old.
36:12 Have mercy upon the people called by your name, Israel whom you surnamed Firstborn.
36:13 Have mercy upon your holy city, Jerusalem, the place of your dwelling.
36:14 Fill Zion with your majesty, And your temple with your glory.
36:15 Give testimony to the first of your works, And establish the vision spoken in your name.
36:16 Give the reward to those who wait for you, That your prophets may be shown to be faithful.
36:17 Hear the prayer of your servants, According to your favor towards your people. That all the ends of the earth may know That you are the Eternal God.
36:18 The throat eats every meat, Yet one meat is better than another.
36:19 The palate tastes the dainties that are bestowed, And the discerning heart the dainties of falsehood.
36:20 A deceitful heart causes sorrow, But a man of experience turns it back upon him.
36:21 A woman will receive any man, But one daughter is better than another daughter.
36:22 The beauty of a woman makes the countenance bright, And excels every delight of the eye.
36:23 And moreover, if there is in her a gentle tongue, Her husband is not from among the sons of men.
36:24 He who acquires a wife has the highest possession, A help meet for him, and a pillar of support.
36:25 Without a hedge a vineyard is laid waste, And without a wife [a man is] a wanderer and homeless.
36:26 Who trusts an armed band That rushes from city to city? So is the man who has no rest, Who rests [where he can] when evening falls.
37:1 Every friend says: "I have a friend," But there is a friend [who is] a friend in name [only].
37:2 So there is a sorrow that comes near to death, A friend according to the soul turned to an enemy.
37:3 O evil nature, why were you created, To fill the face of the world with deceit?
37:4 An evil friend [is he who] looks to the table, But in time of stress stands aloof.
37:5 A good friend [is he who] fights with the stranger, And takes hold of the shield against the adversary.
37:6 Do not forget a friend in [the time of] conflict, And do not forsake him when you take the spoil.
37:7 Every counsellor points out the way, But there is one who counsels a way for his own advantage.
37:8 Of that counsellor let your soul take heed, And know beforehand what is his interest; For he, too, will take thought for himself; Why should it fall out to his advantage?
37:9 And he will say to you, How good is your way! Then will he stand aloof and watch your adversity.
37:10 Do not take counsel with one who dislikes you, And hide your secret from one who is jealous of you.
37:11 (Do not take counsel) with a woman concerning her rival, And an enemy concerning his conflict, With a merchant concerning business, And with a buyer concerning selling, With an evil man concerning the showing of kindness, And with one who is merciless concerning man? s happiness, With a worthless workman concerning his work, And with a yearly hired worker concerning the sowing of seed, With an idle slave concerning much work, Do not trust in these for any counsel.
37:12 But rather with a man who fears always, Whom you know [to be] a keeper of the commandment, Whose heart is like your heart, And if you stumble he will be grieved for you.
37:13 And also discern the counsel of [your own] heart, For there is none more true to you.
37:14 The heart of man declares [to him] his opportunities Better than seven watchmen on a watchtower.
37:15 But in all these things entreat God, That he may direct your steps in truth.
37:16 The beginning of every action is speech, And before every act there is consideration.
37:17 The roots of the deliberations of the heart Throw out four branches:
37:18 Good and evil, life and death; But the tongue rules over them altogether.
37:19 There is a wise man who is wise to many, And to his own soul he shows himself a fool;
37:20 And there is a wise man who is despised for his words, And is cut off from all pleasant food; 
37:22 And there is a wise man who is wise to his own soul, And the fruit of his knowledge is upon his body.
37:23 And there is a wise man who is wise to his people, And the fruit of his knowledge is in their bodies.
37:24 The life of a man [numbers] few days, But the life of Israel days without number.
37:25 He who is wise to his own soul will be satisfied with enjoyment, And all who see him account him happy.
37:26 He who is wise [to his] people gains honor, And his name will live forever.
37:27 My son, in your life prove your soul, And see what is evil for it, and do not give it that.
37:28 For not everything is good for everyone; Every soul does not choose of every kind.
37:29 Do not be insatiable in every luxury, And give not yourself wholly to every dainty.
37:30 For in much eating lurks sickness, And he who consumes too much draws near to loathing.
37:31 Through lack of self-control many have perished, But he who controls himself prolongs his life.
38:1 Be friends with the physician since you have need of him, For God has ordained him also.
38:2 It is from God that the physician becomes wise, And from the king he receives gifts.
38:3 The skill of the physician lifts up his head, So that he stands in the presence of princes.
38:4 God has created medicines out of the earth, And do not let a man of discernment despise them.
38:5 Was not water made sweet by the wood In order to make known his power to all men?
38:6 And he gave to men discernment, To glory in his mighty works;
38:7 By them the physician relieves pain,
38:8 Thus also the compounder make his compound, That his work does not cease, Nor health from the sons of men.
38:9 My son, in sickness do not be negligent; Pray to God, for he can heal.
38:10 Turn from iniquity, and purify your hands; And from all transgressions cleanse your heart.
38:11 Give a meal-offering, and also a memorial, And offer a fat sacrifice to the utmost of your means.
38:12 And also give a place to the physician; And do not let [him] be far from you, for there is indeed need of him.
38:13 For there is a time when success is in his power;
38:14 For he also makes supplication to God To make his diagnosis successful, And the healing that it may give life.
38:15 He who sins against his Maker Behaves proudly towards the physician.
38:16 My son, let tears fall for the dead; Show yourself sorrowful, and mourn with a lamentation. Bury his body according to his due, And do not hide yourself when he has become a corpse.
38:17 Make bitter your weeping and passionate your wailing, And make mourning such as befits him, For a day or two to avoid scandal, And be comforted for your sorrow.
38:18 For out of sorrow comes forth harm, So sadness of heart brings down strength.
38:20 Then let your heart be no more occupied with him, Dismiss the remembrance of him, [yet] remember [your] end.
38:21 Remember him not, for he has no hope; You cannot profit him, while you harm yourself.
38:22 Remember his doom, for it is your doom [too]; His yesterday, and yours today.
38:23 When the dead is at rest, let his memory rest; And be consoled when his soul departs.
38:24 The wisdom of the scribe increases wisdom, And he who has little business can become wise.
38:25 How can he who holds the plow become wise, Who glories in brandishing the ox-goad? Who leads cattle, and turns about oxen, And whose discourse is with bullocks?
38:26 He sets his heart on turning his furrows And his anxiety is to have sufficient fodder.
38:27 Likewise the engraver and craftsman, Who passes his time by night as by day; They cut gravings of signets, And his diligence is to make variety, He sets his heart to make his likeness true, And his anxiety is to finish his work.
38:28 So the blacksmith sitting by the anvil, And considering the unwrought iron; The vapor of the fire cracks his flesh, And in the heat of the furnace he glows; The sound of the hammer is continually in his ear, And his eyes are upon the pattern of the vessel; He sets his heart upon finishing his works, And his diligence is to adorn [them] perfectly,
38:29 So the potter sitting at his work, And turning about the wheel with his feet, Who is ever anxiously set at his work, And all his handiwork is by number;
38:30 With his arm he fashions the clay, And he bends its strength before his feet; He applies his heart to finish the glazing, And his diligence is to clean the furnace.
38:31 All these rely upon their hands, And each is wise in his handiwork.
38:32 Without them a city cannot be inhabited, And they do not sojourn, neither do they walk up and down.
38:33 But in the council of the people they are not sought for, And in the assembly they will not be exalted; They will not sit on the seat of the judge, And they will not [be able to] understand the covenant of judgement; Neither will they expound righteousness and judgement, And among rulers they will not be found.
38:34 But the fabric of the world, they will maintain, And their thoughts are on the handiwork of [their] craft.
39:1 Not so he who gives his soul, And meditates in the law of the Most High; He searches out the wisdom of all the ancients, And is occupied in prophecies;
39:2 He preserves the discourses of men of renown, And enters into subtleties of parables;
39:3 He seeks out the hidden things of proverbs, And is conversant with the obscure things of parables.
39:4 He serves among great men, And appears before a ruler, He travels in the land of alien nations, And has tried both good and evil things among men.
39:5 He applies his heart to rise up early to the Lord who made him; And before the Most High he makes supplication, And opens his mouth in prayer, And makes supplication for his sins.
39:6 If the Great Lord is willing, He will be filled with the spirit of understanding. He himself pours forth words of wisdom, And gives thanks to the Lord in prayer;
39:7 He himself directs his counsel and knowledge, And in the secrets of it he meditates.
39:8 He himself declares the instruction of his teaching, And glories in the law of the covenant of the Lord.
39:9 Many praise his understanding, Never will it be blotted out, His memorial will not cease, And his name will live to generations of generations.
39:10 His wisdom will the Gentiles declare, And his praise will the congregation tell forth.
39:11 If he continues he will be counted [greater than] a thousand; And if he dies, he will become more renowned.
39:12 Yet more will I utter, which I have thought upon, For I am filled like the full moon.
39:13 Hearken to me, you<sup><small>+</small></sup> holy children, and bud forth As a rose growing by a brook of water.
39:14 And as frankincense give forth a sweet odor, And put forth flowers as a lily; Spread forth a sweet smell, and sing a song of praise; Bless<sup><small>+</small></sup> the Lord for all his works;
39:15 O magnify his name, And give utterance to his praise, With songs of the harp and of stringed instruments, And thus will you<sup><small>+</small></sup> say, with a shout:
39:16 The works of God are all good, And for every need he provided in its time.
39:17 None may say: This is worse than that. For everything in its own time is excellent. At his word the waters stood as a heap, And by the word of his mouth his store-chamber.
39:18 He causes his will to prosper, And there is no restraint to his salvation.
39:19 The works of all flesh are before him, And there is nothing hid from before his eyes;
39:20 From everlasting to everlasting he beholds, Therefore there is no limit to his salvation, Nothing is small or insignificant with him, And there is nothing too wonderful or too hard for him.
39:21 None may say: What is this? Why is that? For all has been chosen according to its purpose.
39:22 His blessing overflows as the Nile, And saturates the world as the River.
39:23 Thus his indignation drives out nations, And he turns a watered land to salt.
39:24 The paths of the perfect are straight, [Even] so are they stumbling-blocks to the presumptuous.
39:25 Good things for the good he has allotted from the beginning; [Even] so to the evil; good and evil.
39:26 The chief of all things necessary to the life of man Are water and fire, and iron and salt, And flour of wheat, and milk and honey, The blood of the grape, oil and clothing.
39:27 All these are good to the good, [Even] as for the evil they are turned to evil.
39:28 There are winds that are created for vengeance, And in their wrath lay on their scourges heavily; And in the time of the end they pour out their strength, And appease the wrath of him who created them.
39:29 Fire and hail, famine and pestilence, These also are created for judgement.
39:30 Beasts of prey, scorpions and vipers, And the avenging sword to slay the wicked, All these are created for their uses, And are in [his] treasure-house, and in [their] time will be requisitioned.
39:31 When he commands them they rejoice, And in their prescribed task they do not rebel against him.
39:32 Therefore from the beginning I stood firm, And when I had considered it I set it down in writing:
39:33 The works of God are all good, They supply every need in its season.
39:34 None may say: This is worse than that, For everything shows its strength in its season.
39:35 And now sing praises with all your heart, And bless the name of the Holy One.
40:1 Much occupation God has allotted, And heavy is the yoke on the sons of men; From the day that he comes forth from his mother? s womb, Until the day of his returning to the mother of all living.
40:2 [As for] their thoughts, and fear of heart, The idea of their expectation is the day of death.
40:3 From him who sits upon a throne in exaltation, To him who sits in dust and ashes;
40:4 From him who wears a diadem and crown, To him who wears a garment of hair,
40:5 [There is but] anger and jealousy, anxiety and fear, Terror of death, strife and contention. And when he rests upon his bed, The sleep of night doubles his trouble.
40:6 For a short time, that he may rest for a moment, he is undisturbed, And then by dreams is he disturbed. He is troubled by the vision of his soul, He is like a fugitive fleeing before the pursuer.
40:7 In the time of his deliverance he is aroused, And marvels that [there was] fear for nothing.
40:8 With all flesh, both of man and beast, And upon sinners sevenfold more,
40:9 [There is] pestilence and bloodshed, blight and drought, Devastation and destruction, famine and death.
40:10 For the wicked evil was created, And because of him destruction does not depart.
40:11 All things that are from the earth return to the earth, And that which is from on high [returns] on high.
40:12 All bribery and injustice will be blotted out, And faith will abide forever.
40:13 Wealth [obtained] by injustice is like a perennial torrent, And like a river that is mighty in a storm;
40:14 When it rises rocks are rolled down, So does it suddenly come to an end forever.
40:15 A branch of violence has no shoot in it, And the root of the godless is upon a rocky crag;
40:16 It is like the reeds upon the bank of a river, Which will be dried up before every other plant.
40:17 But kindness will never be moved, And righteousness endures forever.
40:18 A life of wine and strong drink is sweet, But better than both is he who finds a treasure.
40:19 A child and a city establish a name, But better than both is he who finds wisdom. The offspring of cattle, and planting, make a name to flourish. But better than both is a loved woman.
40:20 Wine and strong drink rejoice the heart, But better than both is the affection of lovers.
40:21 Pipe and harp make sweet the song, But better than both is a pure tongue.
40:22 Grace and beauty charm your eye, But better than both are the products of the field.
40:23 A friend and a companion meet opportunely, But better than both is a discreet wife.
40:24 Brothers and help are for a time of affliction, But better than both is righteousness [that] delivers.
40:25 Gold and silver make the foot stand sure, But better than both is counsel esteemed.
40:26 Wealth and strength lift up the heart, But better than both is the fear of God. In the fear of the Lord there is no lack, And with it there is no need to seek [other] help.
40:27 The fear of God is as an Eden of blessing, And over all glory is its canopy.
40:28 My son, do not lead a beggar? s life, Better is one dead than one who begs.
40:29 A man who looks upon a stranger? s table, His life is not accounted life. A pollution of his soul are the dainties presented, And to a man of knowledge [they are] a cause of suffering.
40:30 In the mouth of a greedy man begging is sweet, But within him it burns like fire.
41:1 O, Death, how bitter is the remembrance of you To him who lives in peace in his habitation; To him who is at ease, and prospers in all, And who still has strength to enjoy luxury.
41:2 Hail, Death, how welcome is your decree To a man of sorrows, and who lacks strength, Who stumbles and trips in everything, Who is broken, and has lost hope.
41:3 Fear not death, [it is] your destiny, Remember that the former and the latter share it with you.
41:4 This is the portion of all flesh from God, And how can you reject the law of the Most High? [Be it] for a thousand years, a hundred, or ten [that you live], In Sheol there is no inquiry of [length of] life.
41:5 A disgusting offspring is the generation of sinners, And a godless sprout is in the dwellings of the wicked.
41:6 From the son of the unrighteous dominion will be wrenched away, And with their posterity will be perpetual reproach.
41:7 Children will curse a wicked father, For because of him they suffer reproach.
41:8 Woe to you, ungodly men, Who have forsaken the law of the Most High God.
41:9 If you<sup><small>+</small></sup> be fruitful [it will be] for harm, And if you<sup><small>+</small></sup> bear children [it will be] for sighing; And if you<sup><small>+</small></sup> stumble [it will be] for everlasting joy, And if you<sup><small>+</small></sup> die [it will be] for a curse.
41:10 All that is of nothing returns to nothing, So the godless man, from nothingness to nothingness.
41:11 Vanity is man concerning his body, But the name of the pious will not be cut off.
41:12 Be in fear for your name, for that abides longer for you Than thousands of precious treasures.
41:13 Life? s goods [last] for limited days, But the reward of a name for days without number.
41:14 Hidden wisdom and concealed treasure, What is the use of either?
41:15 Better the man who hides his folly, Than the man who hides his wisdom.
41:16 Hear, O children, instruction concerning shame, And be ashamed according to my judgement. For not every kind of shame is to be retained, And not every kind of shame is to be reproved.
41:17 Be ashamed of a father and a mother of whoredom, Of a prince and ruler of lies,
41:18 Of a master and a mistress of deceit, Of an assembly and people of transgression, Of an associate or friend of dishonesty,
41:19 And of a place of pride where you sojourn. [Be ashamed] of altering an oath or a covenant, Of stretching out your elbow when sitting at meat, Of withholding a gift that is asked for,
41:20 Of turning away the face of your friend, Of taking away a portion or a gift,
41:21 Of being silent to one who greets, Of looking upon a woman who is a whore, Of gazing on a woman who has a husband,
41:22 Of being busy with his maid, And of violating her bed, Of [speaking] to a friend with reproachful words, And of upbraiding after you have given,
42:1 Of repeating a thing which you have heard, And of laying bare any secret counsel: So you will show proper shame, And find favor in the sight of all living. But of these things do not be ashamed, And do not let persons lead you to sin:
42:2 Of the law of the Most High, and the statute, And of justice, to render justice [even] to the wicked,
42:3 Of keeping accounts with an associate or travel companion, And of dividing an inheritance or a property,
42:4 Of the small dust of the scales and balance, And of testing measure and weight, Of buying, as to whether [it is] little or much,
42:5 And of profit from dealing with a merchant, Of frequent correction of children, And of smiting an evil servant.
42:6 For an evil wife, a seal, And where many hands are, a key.
42:7 Upon what is deposited, make a mark, And let giving and receiving all be in writing.
42:8 Of the correction of the foolish and simple [do not be ashamed], Or of [the correction of] the old man occupied with whoredom: So will you be truly well-advised, And a modest man before all living.
42:9 A daughter is to a father a deceptive treasure, And the care of her puts away sleep; In her youth lest she commit adultery, And when she is married, lest she be hated;
42:10 In her virginity lest she be seduced, And in the house of her husband, lest she be unfaithful, In the house of her father, lest she be with child, And in the house of her husband, lest she be barren.
42:11 Keep a strict watch over your daughter, Lest she make you a name that stinks, The talk of the city, and accursed of the people, And shame you in the gathering at the gate. In the place where she abides let there be no window, And in the house where she sleeps no entry round about.
42:12 Do not let her display her beauty before any man, And in the house of women do not let her gossip;
42:13 For from the garment comes forth the moth, And from a woman a woman? s wickedness.
42:14 Better the wickedness of a man than the goodness of a woman, And a daughter who causes shame and pours forth reproach.
42:15 Let me make mention of the works of God, And what I have seen I will also recount. By the word of God are his works, And he does his good pleasure according to his decree.
42:16 The rising sun is revealed over all, And the glory of the Lord upon all his works.
42:17 The holy ones of God do not have the power To recount the wondrous works of his might; [Yet] God has given strength to his hosts To stand in the presence of his glory.
42:18 He searches out the deep, and the heart [of man], And discerns all their secrets; For the Lord knows all knowledge, And he looks into the signs of the world;
42:19 Declaring the things that are past and the things that will be, And revealing the traces of hidden things.
42:20 No knowledge is lacking to him, And not a thing escapes him.
42:21 The mighty works of his wisdom, he has ordered; One is he from everlasting; Nothing has been added, and nothing taken away [from them], And he needs none to instruct [him].
42:22 How desirable are all his works, And they are as a spark to behold.
42:23 All these things live and abide forever, And for every need all are obedient [to him].
42:24 All things are different, this from that, And he did not make one of them superfluous.
42:25 One thing surpasses another in its goodness, And who shall be satiated in beholding [their] beauty?
43:1 The beauty of the height [of the heavens] is the clear firmament, And the vault of heaven is a spectacle of glory.
43:2 The sun when he goes forth pours out heat, How terrible are the works of Yahweh!
43:3 When it shines at noon it scorches the world, Before its burning [heat] who can stand?
43:4 A heated furnace makes the metal become heated, [But] the sending forth of the sun sets mountains ablaze. The rays from the light scorch the inhabited earth, And the light from the lamp scorches the eyes.
43:5 For great is Yahweh who made it, And his word causes his mighty one to shine.
43:6 And also the moon he made for its due season, To rule over periods for an everlasting sign.
43:7 By her festivals and the appointed times [are fixed], A light that wanes when she has come to the full.
43:8 Month by month she renews herself, How wonderful [is she] in her changing! A beacon for the hosts on high, Paving the firmament with her shining.
43:9 The beauty of heaven, and its glory [are] the stars, With their bright shining in the heights of God.
43:10 At the word of God they stand as decreed, And they do not sleep in their watches.
43:11 Behold the rainbow, and bless the Maker of it; It is exceedingly majestic in its glory;
43:12 It encompasses the [heavenly] vault in its glory, And the hand of God has spread it out in might.
43:13 His power sends out the lightning, And makes bright its flashes in judgement;
43:14 For it he created a treasure-house, And clouds fly forth as fowls.
43:15 By his mighty power he makes the clouds strong, And the hailstones are broken small.
43:16 The voice of his thunder makes the earth travail, By his strength he shakes the mountains. And the fear of him stirs up the south wind,
43:17 And the whirlwind of the north, and hurricane and tempest. Like birds he sprinkles his snow, And like settling locusts is the coming down of it;
43:18 The beauty of its whiteness dazzles the eyes, And the heart is amazed at the raining down of it.
43:19 Also the hoarfrost, he pours it out like salt, And he causes flowers to bloom like sapphires.
43:20 The cold of the north wind he causes to blow, And hardens the pond like a bottle; Upon every gathering of waters he spreads a crust, And the pond puts on, as it were, a breastplate.
43:21 The produce of the mountains he dries up with scorching heat, And the springing grass of the meadows as [with] a flame.
43:22 Healing for all things is the dropping from the clouds, The dew which speedily refreshed the parched ground.
43:23 By his counsel he has stilled the great deep, And has planted islands in the midst of the deep.
43:24 Those who go down to the sea declare its bounds, And when our ears hear it we marvel.
43:25 In it are marvels, the wonders of his works, All manner of living things, and mighty things of the deep.
43:26 For his own sake he makes his work prosper, And by his word he works his pleasure.
43:27 Yet more things like these we will not add, And the end of the matter is: He is all.
43:28 We will still magnify, though we cannot fathom, For greater is he than all his works.
43:29 Exceeding terrible is Yahweh, And wonderful are his mighty works.
43:30 You<sup><small>+</small></sup> who magnify Yahweh, lift up your voice, As much as you<sup><small>+</small></sup> are able, for there is yet more! You<sup><small>+</small></sup> who exalt him, renew your strength, And do not be wearied, though you<sup><small>+</small></sup> cannot fathom him.
43:31 Who has seen him that he may declare him? And who shall magnify him as he is?
43:32 Many things, greater than these, are hidden, I have only seen a few of his works.
43:33 Yahweh has made everything, And to the godly he has given wisdom.
44:1 Let me now sing the praises of men of piety, Of our fathers in their generations.
44:2 Great glory did the Most High allot them, And they were great from the days of old.
44:3 [Men] who wielded dominion over the earth in their royalty, And men of renown in their might; Counsellors in their discernment, And seers in their prophetic power.
44:4 Princes of nations in their intentions, And leaders in their decrees; Wise in speech in their scribal office, And speakers of wise sayings in their tradition;
44:5 Arrangers of psalms according to rule, And authors of written proverbs;
44:6 Men of ability and supported with strength, And living at ease in their dwelling-places.
44:7 All these were honored in their generation, And in their days had glory.
44:8 Some of them have left a name That men might tell their praise;
44:9 And some of them have no memorial, There was an end of them when they came to their end; They were as though they had not been, And also their children after them.
44:10 Nevertheless, these were men of piety, And their hope has not ceased;
44:11 With their seed their goodness remains sure, And their inheritance to their children? s children.
44:12 Their seed stands fast in the covenants, And in their children for their sakes;
44:13 Their memory abides forever, And their righteousness will not be forgotten.
44:14 Their bodies were buried in peace, But their name lives to all generations.
44:15 The assembly repeats their wisdom, And the congregation declares their praise.
44:16 Enoch was found perfect, and he walked with Yahweh, and was taken; A sign of knowledge to every generation.
44:17 Noah the righteous was found perfect, In the time of destruction he became the renewer; For his sake there was a remnant, And because of his covenant the Flood ceased;
44:18 An eternal covenant [God] made with him Not to destroy all flesh [again].
44:19 Abraham, the father of a multitude of nations, Put no blemish on his honor;
44:20 He kept the commandments of the Most High, And entered into a covenant with him; In his flesh he made a covenant with him, And in temptation he was found faithful.
44:21 Wherefore, with an oath he swore to him, To bless nations in his seed; To multiply him as the dust of the earth, And to exalt his seed as the stars; To cause them to inherit from sea to sea, And from the River to the ends of the earth.
44:22 And also Isaac he established likewise, For the sake of Abraham his father; He gave him the covenant of all his ancestry.
44:23 And a blessing rested on the head of Israel; And he gave him the title of Firstborn, And gave him his inheritance; And he set him for tribes, To be divided into twelve. And he brought out from him a man of mercy, Who found grace in the sight of all living.
45:1 Beloved of God and men was Moses, Whose memorial is blessed.
45:2 And he made him glorious as God, And made him mighty in awe-inspiring deeds.
45:3 By his words he caused wonders to happen in quick succession, And he made him bold in the presence of the king. And he gave him a charge to the people, And showed him his glory.
45:4 For his faithfulness and his meekness, He chose him out of all flesh,
45:5 And caused him to hear his voice, And let him draw near to the dark cloud; And he placed in his hand the commandment, Even the law of life and discernment; That he might teach statutes to Jacob, And his testimonies and judgements to Israel.
45:6 And he exalted a holy one like him, Even Aaron of the tribe of Levi;
45:7 And he appointed him by a perpetual statute, And put honor upon him; And he blessed him with his glory, And girded him with exceedingly great glory.
45:8 And he clothed him with the perfection of adornment, And adorned him with splendid vestments, the breeches, the tunic, and the robe,
45:9 And encompassed him with pomegranates, and with resounding bells round about, To make music with his steps, So as to cause the sound of him to be heard in the inmost shrine, For a memorial for the children of his people;
45:10 [With] the holy garments of gold and violet, And purple, the work of the designer; And the breastplate of judgement, and the ephod and belt;
45:11 And the scarlet, the work of a craftsman, [With] precious stones engraved like a signet, In settings, the work of the engraver; For a memorial in engraved writing, According to the number of the tribes of Israel,
45:12 [With] a crown of pure gold upon [his] turban, The diadem engraven? Holy to Yahweh,? Glorious majesty and mighty praise, The desire of the eyes, goodly and beautiful.
45:13 Before him there never were such things, Never did a stranger put them on; He trusted him and his sons only, And his son? s sons throughout their generations.
45:14 His meal-offering is wholly consumed Twice every day as a continual sacrifice.
45:15 Moses consecrated him, And anointed him with the holy oil; And it became for him an eternal covenant, And for his seed as the days of heaven; To minister and to execute the priest? s office for him, And to bless his people in his name.
45:16 He chose him out of all living, To bring near the burnt-offerings and the fat pieces, And to burn a sweet savor and a memorial, And to make atonement for the children of Israel.
45:17 And he gave them his commandments, And invested him with authority over statute and judgement, That he might teach his people statutes, And judgements to the children of Israel.
45:18 But strangers were incensed against him, And were envious against him in the wilderness; The men of Dathan and Abiram, And the company of Korah in the violence of their wrath.
45:19 And Yahweh saw it and was angered, And consumed them in his fierce wrath; And he brought to pass a sign upon them, And devoured them with his fiery flame.
45:20 And he increased his glory to Aaron, And gave him his inheritance: The holy contributions for their sustenance, The offerings of Yahweh made by fire for them to eat,
45:21 The bread of the presence is his portion, A gift for him and for his seed.
45:22 Only in the land of the people might he have no heritage, And in their midst divide no inheritance; Whose portion and inheritance is Yahweh, In the midst of the children of Israel.
45:23 Moreover, Phinehas, the son of Eleazar, Was glorious in might as a third, In that he was jealous for the God of all, And stood in the breach for his people; While his heart prompted him, And he made atonement for the children of Israel.
45:24 Therefore also for him he established an ordinance, A covenant of peace to maintain the sanctuary; That to him and to his seed should appertain The high priesthood forever.
45:25 And also with David was his covenant, The son of Jesse, of the tribe of Judah; The inheritance of the king is his son? s alone, While the inheritance of Aaron [belongs] to him, and to his seed. And now bless<sup><small>+</small></sup> Yahweh, the Good, Who has crowned you with honor;
45:26 May he grant you wisdom of heart, To judge his people in righteousness, That your prosperity may never cease, Nor your power for eternal generations.
46:1 A mighty man of valor was Joshua, the son of Nun, A minister of Moses in the prophetical office, Who was created to be according to his name, A great salvation for his chosen ones, To take vengeance upon the enemy, And to give an inheritance to Israel.
46:2 How glorious he was when he stretched forth his hand, And brandished his javelin against the city.
46:3 Who was [able] to stand before him When he fought the wars of Yahweh?
46:4 Was it not by his hand that the sun stood still And one day became as two?
46:5 For he called to God Most High, When enemies pressed him on every side, And God Most High answered him, With hailstones and bolts;
46:6 He cast them down upon the hostile people. And in going down he destroyed those who rose up, That all the nations [devoted to] destruction might know That Yahweh was watching their fighting; And also because he fully followed after God,
46:7 And did an act of piety in the days of Moses, He and Caleb, the son of Jephunneh, In standing firm when the congregation broke loose, To turn away wrath from the assembly, And to cause the evil report to cease.
46:8 Therefore also these two were set apart, From among the six hundred thousand footmen, To bring them into their inheritance, [Into] a land flowing with milk and honey.
46:9 And he gave strength to Caleb, And to old age it stood by him, To cause him to tread upon the high places of the land; And also his seed obtained a heritage,
46:10 That all the seed of Jacob might know That it is good to follow wholly after Yahweh.
46:11 Also the Judges, each with his name, All whose hearts were not beguiled, Nor turned back from [following] after God, Let their memory be for a blessing,
46:12 May their bones flourish again out of their place, And may their name sprout afresh for their children.
46:13 Honored by his people, and loved by his Maker [Was] "He who was asked" from his mother? s womb; Sanctified in the prophetical office by Yahweh, Samuel, [who acted as] judge and priest. By the word of God he established the kingdom, And anointed princes over the people.
46:14 By means of the commandment he commanded the congregation, And he visited the gods of Jacob.
46:15 By his faithfulness he was proved to be a prophet, And by his word a faithful seer.
46:16 And when his enemies pressed him on every side, He called upon the Yahweh, the Mighty One, With the offering of a nursing lamb. [He cried to Yahweh].
46:17 And Yahweh thundered from heaven; With a mighty crash his voice was heard,
46:18 And he subdued the strong places of the enemy, And destroyed all the princes of the Philistines.
46:19 And at the time when he rested upon his bed, He called Yahweh and his anointed to witness: "From whom have I taken a bribe, or a pair of shoes?" And no man accused him. And also to the time of his end he was found upright In the eyes of Yahweh, and in the eyes of all living.
46:20 And even after his death he was inquired of, And he declared to the king his fate; And he lifted his voice from the earth, To blot out the wickedness of the people.
47:1 And, furthermore, after him stood up Nathan, To stand in the presence of David;
47:2 For as the fat is separated from the offering, So was David [separated] from Israel.
47:3 He played with lions as with young goats, And with bears as with calves of Bashan.
47:4 In his youth he slew the giant, And took away the reproach from the people; When he slung his hand with the sling, And broke the pride of Goliath.
47:5 For he called to God Most High. And he gave strength to his right hand, That it might strike down the man experienced in wars, And that he might lift up the horn of his people.
47:6 Therefore the daughters sang of him, And honored him, [the slayer of] ten thousand. When he had put on the diadem he fought,
47:7 And subdued the enemy round about, And he destroyed the cities of the Philistines, And broke in pieces their power to this day.
47:8 In all his doings he gave thanks To God Most High with words of glory; With his whole heart he loved his Maker, And sang praise every day continually.
47:9 Stringed instruments and song before the altar [he ordained], To make sweet melody with their music.
47:10 He gave comeliness to the feasts, And set in order the seasons to perfection, While they praised his holy name; Before morning it resounded from the sanctuary.
47:11 Moreover, Yahweh put away his transgression, And lifted up his horn forever. And he gave him the decree of the kingdom, And established his throne over Israel.
47:12 And for his sake there stood up after him A wise son dwelling in safety.
47:13 Solomon reigned in days of peace, And God gave him rest round about. He prepared a house for his name, And established a sanctuary forever.
47:14 How wise were you in your youth, And overflowed, like the Nile, with instruction;
47:15 You covered the earth with your soul, And gathered parables like the sea.
47:16 Your name reached to the isles afar off; And for your peace you were beloved.
47:17 By your songs, proverbs, parables, And answers to questions, you astonished the peoples.
47:18 You were called by the glorious name, Which is called over Israel. You heaped up gold like tin, And multiplied silver like lead.
47:19 But you gave your loins to women, And caused them to rule over your body;
47:20 Yes, you brought a blemish upon your honor, And defiled your bed, So as to bring wrath upon your children, And sighing concerning your couch.
47:21 So the people became two scepters, And from Ephraim [arose] a sinful kingdom.
47:22 Nevertheless, God did not forsake his mercy, And will not let any of his words fall to the ground; He will not cut off the posterity of his chosen, And the offspring of those who love him he will not destroy; And he gave to Jacob a remnant, And to the house of David a root from him.
47:23 And Solomon slept in Jerusalem, And left after him one who was overbearing; Great in folly, and lacking in understanding [Was] Rehoboam, he who by his counsel made the people revolt, Until there arose, let there be no memorial of him, Jeroboam the son of Nebat, Who sinned, and made Israel to sin; And he put a stumbling-block [before] Ephraim,
47:24 To drive them from their land; And their sin became very great, And they sold themselves to do all manner of evil.
48:1 Until there arose a prophet like fire, And his word was like a burning furnace.
48:2 And he broke for them the staff of bread, And by his zeal he made them small in number.
48:3 By the word of God he shut up the heavens, Also fire came down three times.
48:4 How terrible were you, Elijah! And he who is like you will be glorified.
48:5 Who raised up a corpse from death, And from Sheol by the favor of Yahweh;
48:6 Who brought down kings to the Pit, And famous men from their beds [of sickness];
48:7 Who heard rebukes from Sinai, And from Horeb judgements of vengeance.
48:8 Who anointed kings for retribution, And a prophet to succeed in your place.
48:9 Who in the whirlwind was taken upwards, And with fiery troops to the heavens.
48:10 Who is written as ready for the time, To still wrath before the fierce anger of God, To turn the hearts of the fathers to the children, And to restore the tribes of Israel.
48:11 Blessed are those who see you [at your return], and those who have fallen asleep in love; For we too will surely live.
48:12 Elijah [it was] who was wrapped in a tempest, Then Elisha was filled with his spirit. In double measure he multiplied signs, And wonderful was all that went forth from his mouth. [During] his days he moved before none, And no flesh ruled over his spirit;
48:13 Nothing was too wonderful for him, And from his grave his flesh prophesied.
48:14 In his life he did wonderful acts, And in his death marvellous works.
48:15 For all this the people did not turn, And did not cease from their sins; Until they were plucked from their land, And were scattered in all the earth; And there were left in Judah but a few; Yet to the house of David was left a prince.
48:16 Some of them did that which was right, And some of them sinned more and more.
48:17 Hezekiah fortified his city By bringing water into the midst of it; And he hewed the rocks with iron, And dammed up the pool with mountains.
48:18 In his days Sennacherib came up, And sent Rabshakeh, Who stretched forth his hand against Zion, And blasphemed God in his pride.
48:19 Then were they shaken in the pride of their heart, And they were in anguish like a woman in travail;
48:20 So they called to God Most High, And spread forth their hands to him, And he heard the voice of their prayer, And saved them by the hand of Isaiah.
48:21 And he smote the army of Assyria, And discomfited them by the plague.
48:22 For Hezekiah did that which was pleasing to the Lord, And was strong in the ways of David, Which Isaiah the prophet commanded, Who was great and faithful in his vision.
48:23 In his days the sun went backward, And he added life to the king.
48:24 By a spirit of might he saw the latter end, And comforted the mourners of Zion.
48:25 To eternity he declared the things that will be, And hidden things before they came to pass.
49:1 The name of Josiah is as sweet incense, That is well mixed, the work of the perfumer. The memorial of him is sweet in the palate like honey, And as music at a banquet of wine.
49:2 For he was grieved at their backslidings, And caused the vain abominations to cease;
49:3 And he gave his heart wholly to God, And in days of violence he showed kindness.
49:4 Except David, Hezekiah, And Josiah, they all dealt corruptly, And forsook the law of the Most High,-- The kings of Judah, until their end.
49:5 And their might was given to others, And their glory to a strange nation.
49:6 And so the Holy City was burned, And its ways were laid waste, by the hand of Jeremiah,
49:7 Because they persecuted him, And from the womb he was a prophet, "To pluck up, to break down, and to destroy, And likewise to build, and to plant," and to strengthen.
49:8 Ezekiel saw a vision, And declared the different beings of the chariot.
49:9 He also made mention of Job among the prophets, Who was complete in all the ways of righteousness.
49:10 And also the Twelve Prophets, May their bones sprout beneath them, Who made Jacob whole, And delivered him by confident hope.
49:11 How shall we magnify Zerubbabel, He, indeed, was a signet on the right hand;
49:12 And also Joshua, the son of Jehozadak, Who in their days built the House, And set up on high the Holy Temple, Which was prepared for everlasting glory.
49:13 Nehemiah, glorious is his memory. Who raised up our ruins, And healed our breaches, And set up gates and bars.
49:14 Few have been created on the earth like Enoch; He also was taken up from off the face of it.
49:15 Like Joseph was there ever a man born? His body was also visited.
49:16 Shem, and Seth, with Enoch were honored; But above every living thing was the glory of Adam. Great among his brethren, and the glory of his people
50:1 Was Simeon, the son of Jochanan, the priest. In whose generation the house was renovated, And in whose days the temple was fortified;
50:2 In whose generation a reservoir was dug, A water cistern like the sea in abundance.
50:3 In his days the wall was built, [With] turrets for strength like a king? s palace.
50:4 He considered how [to protect] his people from ruin, And fortified his city against the enemy.
50:5 How glorious he was when he looked forth from the tent, And when he came out of the sanctuary.
50:6 Like a morning star from between the clouds, And like the full moon on the feast-days,
50:7 Like the sun shining upon the Temple of the King, And like the bow appearing in the cloud;
50:8 Like blossoms on a branch in the days of first fruits, And as a lily by the water brooks, As the sprout of Lebanon in the days of summer,
50:9 And as the fire of incense in the censer; Like a golden vessel beautifully wrought, Adorned with all manner of precious stones;
50:10 Like a green olive tree full of berries, And like a wild olive tree nourishing branches.
50:11 When he put on his glorious robes, And clothed himself in full splendor, When he went up to the altar of majesty, And made glorious the court of the sanctuary;
50:12 When he took the portions from the hands of his brethren, And he stood by the prepared wood, Around him [was] the garland of his sons, Like young cedar trees in Lebanon; And like willows by the brook they surrounded him;
50:13 All the sons of Aaron in their glory, And the offering by fire to Yahweh in their hand, In the presence of all the congregations of Israel.
50:14 Until he had finished the service of the altar; And setting in order the rows of wood for the Most High,
50:15 He stretched his hand to the cup, And poured out the blood of the grape, Yes, he poured it out at the foot of the altar, A sweet-smelling savor to the Most High, the King of all.
50:16 Then the sons of Aaron sounded With the trumpets of beaten work; Yes, they sounded, and caused a mighty blast to be heard, For a remembrance before the Most High.
50:17 [Then] all flesh made haste together, And fell upon their faces to the earth, To worship before the Most High, Before the Holy One of Israel;
50:18 And the song then gave its voice, And over the multitude they made sweet melody;
50:19 And all the people of the land cried In prayer before him who is merciful, Until he had finished the service of the altar, And his ordinances had brought him near to him.
50:20 Then he came down and lifted up his hands Upon all the congregation of Israel, And the blessing of Yahweh [was] upon his lips, And in the name of Yahweh he glorified himself.
50:21 And a second time they fell down, [now] to receive The pardon of God from him.
50:22 Now bless the God of all, Who does wondrously on earth, Who exalts man from the womb, And does to him according to his good pleasure.
50:23 May he grant to you wisdom of heart, And may there be peace among you.
50:24 May his mercy be established with Simeon, And may he raise up for him the covenant of Phinehas; May there not be one cut off from him, And as to his seed [may it be] as the days of heaven.
50:25 Against two nations does my soul feel abhorrence, And [against] a third, [which is] not a people:
50:26 The inhabitants of Seir, and Philistia, And that foolish nation which dwells in Shechem.
50:27 Wise instruction and apt proverbs Of Simeon, the son of Jeshua, the son of Eleazar, the son of Sira, Which he declared in the explanation of his heart, And which he taught with his understanding.
50:28 Blessed is the man who meditates on these things; And he who lays them up in his heart will become wise.
50:29 For if he does them, he will be strong for all things, For the fear of Yahweh is life.
51:1 I will thank you, Yahweh, O King, I will praise you, O God of my salvation; I will declare your name, You are the strength of my life;
51:2 For you have redeemed my soul from death, You have kept back my flesh from the Pit, And have delivered my feet from the hand of Sheol. You preserved me from the slander of the people, from the scourge of a slanderous tongue, And from the lips of those who turn aside to lying, You were with me in the presence of those who rose up against me.
51:3 You helped me, according to the abundance of your mercy, Out of the snare of those watching for my downfall, And from the hand of those who seek my soul; Out of many troubles you have saved me,
51:4 And from the straits of the flame [round about me], From the midst of the fire that I did not kindle,
51:5 From the deep of the belly of Sheol, From wickedly devising lips, And from those who plaster falsehood,
51:6 And [from] the arrows of a deceitful tongue. My soul drew near to death, And my life to the nethermost Sheol;
51:7 And I turned about on every side, and there was none who helped me; Yes, I looked for one to uphold, but there was none.
51:8 Then I remembered the lovingkindnesses of Yahweh, And his mercies which have been from of old; He delivers those who put their trust in him, And redeems them from all evil.
51:9 And I lifted up my voice from the earth, And from the gates of Sheol I cried;
51:10 Yes, I cried: "Yahweh, you are my Father, My God, and the strength of my salvation, Do not forsake me in the day of trouble, In the day of wasteness and desolation.
51:11 I will praise your name continually, And will remember you in prayer." Then Yahweh heard my voice, And gave ear to my supplication.
51:12 And he redeemed from all evil, And delivered me in the day of trouble; Therefore will I give thanks [to him] and praise [him], And I will bless the name of Yahweh: i. Give thanks to Yahweh, for he is good, For his mercy endures forever. ii. Give thanks to the God of praises, For his mercy endures forever. iii. Give thanks to the Keeper of Israel, For his mercy endures forever. iv. Give thanks to the Framer of all, For his mercy endures forever. v. Give thanks to the Redeemer of Israel, For his mercy endures forever. vi. Give thanks to him who gathers the outcasts of Israel, For his mercy endures forever. vii. Give thanks to him who builds his City and his Sanctuary, For his mercy endures forever. viii. Give thanks to him who causes a horn to sprout for the house of David, For his mercy endures forever. ix. Give thanks to him who chooses the sons of Zadok for priests, For his mercy endures forever. x. Give thanks to the Shield of Abraham, For his mercy endures forever. xi. Give thanks to the Rock of Isaac, For his mercy endures forever. xii. Give thanks to the Mighty One of Jacob, For his mercy endures forever. xiii. Give thanks to him who chooses Zion, For his mercy endures forever. xiv. Give thanks to the King of the kings of kings, For his mercy endures forever. xv. And he has exalted the horn of his people, The praise of all his pious ones, xvi. For the children of Israel, a people near to him; Hallelujah.
51:13 I was a youth When I desired her and sought her out.
51:14 In my youth I made supplication and prayer, And I will seek her out even to the end.
51:15 She blossomed like a ripening grape, My heart rejoiced in her; My foot trod in her footstep; From my youth I learned wisdom.
51:16 I bowed down my ear a little and received her, And I found much knowledge.
51:17 And her yoke was a glory to me; And to my teacher I offer thanks.
51:18 I purposed to do good with her, And I will not turn back, for I will find her.
51:19 My soul was attached to her, And I did not turn my face away from her. I spread forth my hands to the heaven above, And forever and ever I will not swerve from her. My hand opened her gates, And to her I entered, and looked upon her.
51:20 I directed my soul after her, And in her purity I found her; I obtained understanding through her guidance, Therefore I will not be forsaken.
51:21 My inward parts were troubled like an oven [yearning] to look upon her, Therefore I have obtained her as a good possession.
51:22 Yahweh gave me the reward of my lips, And with my tongue I praise him.
51:23 Turn in to me, you<sup><small>+</small></sup> unlearned, And lodge in my house of instruction.
51:24 How long will you<sup><small>+</small></sup> lack these things, And your soul be very thirsty?
51:25 I open my mouth and speak of her, Get wisdom for yourselves without money.
51:26 Bring your necks under her yoke, And let your soul bear her burden; She is near to those who seek her, And he who yearns [for her] finds her.
51:27 See with your eyes that but a short time I labored for her, And found abundance of peace.
51:28 Hearken to my teaching in [however small] a number, And will you<sup><small>+</small></sup> acquire much silver and gold by it.
51:29 May my soul delight in my Yeshibah, And you<sup><small>+</small></sup> will not be ashamed to sing my praise.
51:30 Work your work before the time, And he will give you your reward in its time. Blessed be Yahweh, and praised be his name to generations. Thus far the words of Simeon, the son of Jeshua, who is called Ben-Sira. The Wisdom of Simeon, the son of Jeshua, the son of Eleazar, the son of Sira. May the name of Yahweh be blessed from now even to eternity.
